I have loved crafting since I was a small child; I remember loving to color and make things with paper back then. As a young adult I started collecting ephemera; I love the look, feel, and history of it. Over the years I have created with ceramics, beads, polymer clay and many other crafts and always have fun doing it. I will try anything....lol. I started scrapbooking 20 years ago when there was nothing on the market and had to dream up my own ideas. And about 8 years ago I joined a group of ladies who were card making, and we get together once a month to play. And that progressed to trading ATCs. My passion is cardmaking and I am loving playing with you all on Blogland...it's helping to feed my addiction to all things paper.
Then I met people who helped me greatly
Direct instruction appears to be a suitable model of teaching in the lower elementary grades, but I would be very interested to see and learn how indirect instruction could be effectively incorporated to expand the minds of these youngsters. Overall, I have benefited greatly from the readings because I have a frame of reference to identify and make sense of the methods and strategies that teachers employ in my upcoming classroom observation assignment. As my goal is to be a versatile and engaging educator, I am encouraged by the author’s assertion that “many times, the two models can be effectively interwoven in a single lesson, as when a small number of facts, rules, or action sequences must be acquired before introducing a concept to be learned or problem to be solved (p. 287).”
To ensure victory, they emlpoy a very clever way – the “kidnap” strategy.
I love those purple doors and they are probably the high light of couples therapy for me. I really don't like the couples therapy. I actually prefer to just talk alone with my own therapist. I feel he has probably helped me more then the couples therapist. It isn't that the lady we are seeing isn't good. I just find that it is draining and I don't leave there feeling real positive.
ps. have I mentioned that the food here is amazing? I am going to have look for a cookbook. AND! ANDANDAND: I just finished this bookd called "Sabor a chocolate" or "Chocolate Flavor" that was published in 2006. It is a life and love story, and much of it takes place during WWII. Anyone who likes old movies or love stories I think would like it. It is a quick read and I think I might have to buy it and read it again (I borrowed my host mom´s copy.).
just shelled out $1.45 MILLION
Really? Unless someone has a medical condition I can pretty much assure them that if they have been on the plan for six weeks they would consistently lose weight.
I'll probably share some thoughts about working with Lulu at some point, though I might be sharing them over on my other site. I hope you'll come visit there, too. Spare tho it may be over there at present, I do believe it'll feel more like home as soon as I hang some art and cook a few meals.
now... with the weather cooling down a bit, snacks and dips are fine for starters, something to get the game day going but toward the final end of the day, I'm looking for something a little hardier. I thought of my Chicken Chili with just enough Latin seasoning to warm you up. Find it below, after you link in your own Game-Day recipe.
09.Mothers Of The World 05:18
I used the following:
This ultimate Being and ultimate Consciousness overflows constantly in the Outpouring of its essence, its nature, which is pure absolute love, complete compassion, total truth, ultimate beauty, Outpouring.
10. Never ending story
Chapter 22 contains miscellaneous laws, including one that states that if a man is caught in adultery with another man’s wife, BOTH of them are to die, which is interesting in light of the scene in the New Testament where the Pharisees drag a woman in front of Jesus, claiming she was caught in adultery. I’ve always wondered why they didn’t bring the man, too.
paying the minimum balance gets you nowhere, pay as much as you can as often as you can. its good for your credit score and it reduses how much you will pay in the long run.
ilovewhitehorse.blogspot.com
Just as the Sun takes centre stage in the solar system and is the giver of all light, so are these little cosmic limelight stealers. They just love to be the centre of attention and to feel that they’re the centre of your universe.
Put differently, truth is that which inevitably contradicts itself. Perhaps that is what is borne out by my story in the end. That is why, instead of the truth, I offer you a greater consolation: a dream.
Grade: B-/B
It’s Monday again, and like I said in my last Motivational Monday, everybody hates Mondays. I often find myself getting very annoyed and frustrated because I know that I still have another four days of work. I know that you have to get through these days to get the weekend, but there must be a way to have it a little easier! Here’s some tips on how to get rid of your frustration.
Looking back over 40 or more years at these clips, I'm amazed at just how good she was. In this first clip of the Springfields singing "Island of Dreams" the band are singing live into one mike with the studio orchestra in the wings. No miming, although the fake American accents are a bit much. The guitarist at the back struggles to play a Bb chord at one part. Still awesome though.
Roll the arancini in the flour and shake off any excess. Then dip the ball in egg and roll it in bread crumbs.
Hello Everyone and, no, this is not Beth. Day 2 has been a very uncomfortable day for Beth and Max. Beth has been having a lot of pain, which she anticipated. What she didn't expect was the severe nausea, muscle spasms and headache that accompanies the surgery and the morphine pca.
…throwing your door open and letting whatever evil passes by to come in.
He was dashing and brave
Challenges I joined:
So did I do the logical things? The logical things being, 1. to stop eating the stale doughnuts and 2. to walk back into the store and buy one good, fresh fritter.
NFL draft guru Mel Kiper Jr. recently came out with his 2010 mock draft. I still remember watching him prognosticate and pontificate on live drafts in the early 80′s. I wonder how he got that gig? Regardless, he is the acknowledged top dog expert and his mock drafts come out now in January. I was interested to see who he tabbed the Seahawks taking with their first two picks.
"Wait!"
I've visited Joanne Chang's Boston bakery last year and it was delicious! You can make many of these yummy delights at home with the cookbook!
EOH: In the report that was released, a representative from Treasury was very specific that at the time you asked for a meeting with the National Bankers Association, Treasury was getting 70 to 80 calls a day from all financial parties about the Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac bailout and your call was simply one among the many. Why then is considered now a major offense?
(or if you can find them on sale, rolls of Rolos... save yourself all that unwrapping time)
Four: Accessories (candles, vases, flowers, collections, Objet d’art) that fabulously fill dining tables, buffets and consoles, all need to be moved when the table is in use. That is, if you want to verily converse, eat, study or serve food. I know, I know. They’re for aesthetic beauty. And gorgeous these settings are. But, when ‘form’ has to bow to the ‘function’ part of life, where does one deposit these items? I am guessing that after inspiring an ensemble ten or twelve times a month, one might determine to live outside the pages of glam in favor of time and effort conservation. How can we have our cake and eat it too? Or in this case, have our cake and serve it too?
Dear Ms. Krider,
Examples of series I could have chosen to meet my parameters?
in that bar of the Allegro
My latest book is Scrivener's Moon, the third in the Fever Crumb sequence, which is set in the same world as Mortal Engines but many years earlier.
That offer was accepted (Sweet!) and we just had the home inspection yesterday. Things are moving along, and while there are still so many moving parts and things that could fall through, I am just so so so hopeful that this is our house. We didn't see another one that even came close to what we want, so if it ain't this.... it's rental city for the next who-knows-how-long.
Despite World cup win, followed by last IPL season(within a week), then back to back tours (where btw, India failed miserably) and just when I was thinking all is over, the TV started flashing those sexy cheerleaders jumping up and down with pompoms and cricketers lusting for the orange, purple and god knows what caps.
REVIEW OF THE YEAR!
Examples of sites who use content farms are Yahoo, eHow, about.com and, suprisingly, livestrong.com. eHow and Livestrong are brands of a company called Demand Media, the world’s largest content farm. Another of Demand Media’s brands is cracked.com, whose “top” lists provide a good example of the quality of content coming out of these content farms.
Today’s MANday is brought to you by Lani Wendt Young. She’s a Samoan author who also blogs about life as a slightly demented Domestic Goddess at http://sleeplessinsamoa.blogspot.com
If you play the keyboard, the buzzing changes in pitch. There's usually some kind of
“The sad truth is that the president wanted a blank check six months ago, and he wants a blank check today,” Boehner said. “That is just not going to happen.”
Now check out this outfit below. If I saw someone wearing this I’d be thinking ‘Wow they’re probably awesome’ or ‘Wow, you’d better be good to wear that’. All I know is that this is a pretty serious running outfit. Look at it, it’s navy and white. Those are no nonsense colours. It’s a running outfit that screams serious athlete and that I am a long way from that.
I wonder why this month has inspired such dark images, “life is nothing”, “an empty cup”. Poor April! Are you going to be the cruellest month?
Pho? What’s that?
There is, of course, a lesson in all this. First they deprived Arabs of any democratic rights and now they are coming for even the Zionist left. Such is the logical outcome of Zionist nationalist zealotry. It consumers its own in its desire for an ethnically ‘pure’ Israeli nation state and a continuous wave of colonial expansion.
An ideal way to use up any leftover yarns you have and put a smile on a child’s face, which is worth more than anything!
*rips hair out; jumps off bridge*
Sassafras has softball practice at 6 pm so again a buddy’s mom or Paw Paw steps in to help. Have I mentioned how thankful I am for friends and family?
I bought the other fabric on thursday because the pink one I bought too wasn't allowedTT so I bought a this one at 'Karstadt'. There I saw such a lovely fabric perfect for a Kimono...I consider if I should buy it...I fell so in love with it...unfortunately I forgot to make photos of itTT
Unfortunately for us, Gregory was in Canada at the time of the announcement but his prize was collected for him by Roisin Heycock, the editor of this unusual book. Apparently he wrote it in Iceland in eight months in "a room so small he could touch both ends ... while standing in the middle."
These folks are asking people to call, bully and harass the companies that do business with the Sun until we bow and scrap before them and their point of view. The boycott appears to have the backing of the paper Xtra.
“Something funny, Mr. McKenzie?” She raised a brow. “Or don’t you believe any of this?”
Golmaal (part I), starring Paresh Rawal(played as Dada ji), Ajay Devgan(Gopaal), Arshad Warsi(Mahdhav), Tushaar Kapoor(Lucky), Sherman Joshi(Laxman) , Remi sen(Niraali) and many more, was full comedy masala that cause a bit pain in cheeks and jaws of audience due to non-stops open mouth laughs. That was entirely a different subject chose by Rohit to make. Every character did great justice with their roles. Ajay Devgan admired alot for his brilliant acting. An exciting trait did by Tushaar that became very popular and admiring as well. Golmaal(part-I) didn’t have great collection of songs but its one of the songs Kio aagey peechey dolte ho, filled the spacing undoubtly.
1. His will works spiritual changes corresponding to natural phenomena
I received the first lovely quilt shown here from Kaite Matilda in NSW. It is a lovely bright and fun quilt and will be going to a child who attends a camp at the end of the year, for neglected/abused children.
The Civil War was fought from Sumter to Appomattox, from April 12, 1861, to April 9, 1865. But the roots of the war predated 1861, and the consequences lived on long after 1865. In reality the Civil War never ended, it just shifted from a military to a culture war - the same culture war that is still going on today....
Always leading toward the compassionate resolution.
Sweet Roll Dough
I also spent all day Friday piecing together a king size quilt for my Aunt Sandie. It seems that my mom has passed her over when it comes to the quilt making area. So she needed my help to put it together for her. SO does it count if I made it and she bought the material? I'm not sure. But I baste it and quilt it this week, along with some other quilts that I need to get done. So pictures to come. Sorry Sandie! :D But you will love it!
“Mom, I love you. But I have nothing in common with your friends' offspring.”
Two weeks from now, I’ll be reading from Safe Harbor at Crime Writers of Canada’s Arthur Ellis Shortlist Event. I’m tickled pink that I was asked to participate in the Toronto event because I’ll be sharing the stage some of Canada’s best-known crime fiction writers. Rosemary Aubert, Rick Blechta, Maureen Jennings, Ian Hamilton and Robert Rotenberg, to name a few.
The Plot: Wow. This is hard. It's about the Bluth family, a wonderfully dysfunctional, functional family. The father (and head of the family company) was just arrested and is in prison, good son Michael is trying to keep the family, the business, and the finances together. It's a bit hard because his family is out of control. And they are so over the top that words fail me.
There were drawbacks. No spell-check. Cut and paste meant exactly that. You typed one (hopefully!) clean copy, then spent a mint having it photocopied. But that was true of manuals too, and at least my fingers didn’t ache. As much.
Again, I would advocate getting an actual magazine of varying puzzles and doing this manually. Games and electronics or fine but they tend to have extra features which can detract from the simplicity of focussing hard on one puzzle. This can be hard to get back into if you’ve not done it for a long while but once you do you’ll wonder why you ever stopped. Again, don’t make it a chore, just keep it reasonably regular.
The lack of internet will be giving me plenty of time, however, to get my craft corner back together and work on some new projects to share, so make sure to check back on the 16th (hopefully! If I go longer than that with no internet I may lose my mind entirely) I am going to have some cute Spring/Summer themed art projects as well as some more projects that got set on the back burner in March due to packing for the move.
I have a cold, and trying to figure out how to get all my hotmail messages into neat little folders is agrravating it. There is a new feature that lets you type the sender of a message into a search box, it is supposed to search your INBOX; IT DOES NOT search your inbox (i.e. I type the name of a certain email into the search box, it has the date on the right hand of the email; I put it into a folder and go back, the same one with the same date appears at the top of the search; so i get wise and realize that it has not even searched my inbox, just the folder where I have the emails). I have certain folders to keep my emails in. MSN should know this, but for some dumb reason, It searches the folders. HEY! OF COURSE I would have all of one type of email in a folder. I PUT THEM THERE! SEARCH THE INBOX, NOT THE FOLDERS!
cauldron of unholy loves sang all about mine ears.”
The Adelphean handclasp is a symbol of friendship and sisterhood, yes. But, it is also a symbol of love and compassion. It is the symbol of that solidarity, that acceptance and encouragement that we all look for when we join an organization. I will always remember the sisters who held my hands and I will always be grateful for the love and support that such a small gesture was able to give to me.
1/2 oz - Amarillo (30 min)
if I say to you “To you I say,” you have not been
The boy, as you might imagine, was apoplectic; but the mom, as you might imagine, was dismissive of his concerns and sent him into class with a motivating "Now, behave!" When he got into class, he had a hard time sitting still, following instruction, or paying attention. Most critically, he was visibly upset and not having fun: he came out of class several times crying, with his mom saying things like "Get back in there or I'm grounding you from seeing your friends for at least a week!" or "Let's see how you like when I take away some of your Pokemon." With nothing to motivate him but the threat of punishment, he returned to the class and made the best situation out of it that his little brain and heart could manage.
My plan is to put it in my closet. I've got a large walk-in closet and I have been wanting a chair in there to sit on while I put on tights, boots, socks, etc. It looks really cute in there but no one will see it. What should I do????
b) Spends lots of money on children whose parents aren't making much money. This is just stupid, since the kids can't even vote, and their working-class parents are probably too busy to vote. What programs like CHIP do is allow harmless children to turn into dangerous voting seniors, who are basically like terrorists who hold the country hostage by having nothing better to do than show up at the polls. Hence the Pledge's gun-point promise not to touch Social Security or Medicare. If we allow underprivileged children to turn into old people, we are letting the terrorists win.
There are 3 YES 3 chances to win. First prize is a double page feature in the magazine, 2nd prize is a half page ad designed by us for you and third prize will be 6 months worth of advertising in the handmade market section of the magazine - how cool is that!
This makes him sad.
I move into my apartment and begin teaching on Thursday. And let me tell you, I can't get out of this guesthouse soon enough. Guesthouse horror stories will have to wait for another time though, because right now I am exhausted.
Worn by ‘Roslyn’ in The Misfits. Roslyn wears this dress to go for a day at the rodeo. The dress has a wide V neck line on the front and back. Straps are ruched on the shoulders and have a bow. The original dress has pleating at the waistband but we didn’t think this looked nice in rubber so left it plain.
....I should focus less on changing the way the chest looks and instead appreciate the items I'm placing inside of it. The beauty is in the make up of the chest. The unfinished wood, the creaks and squeaks of the cover and the smells are all part of the package.
Last year, the top four banks earned net profits totalling $99 billion, more than double at their U.S. equivalent – Citibank, J.P. Morgan Chase, Bank of America Merrill Lynch and Wells Fargo.
One trait that Eric inherited from his father is athleticism. Although he has just begun his college journey, Eric is playing for the Otterbein Tennis Team. Eric loves the sport, but is quick to point out, “I’m a student-athlete; student first and athlete second.” Eric says that his coach is a great mentor and emphasizes the importance of academics by encouraging his team to keep up their grades in order to be eligible to play. Eric adds, “Balancing schoolwork with teamwork is what being a student-athlete is about. Being able to be involved in a few things on campus is rewarding, and it is a good way to make friends.”
Whatever question there might have been about him in his life, all men conspired to honor him in his death. The ruler of a nation who could subdue a gallant and a mighty foe could not subdue that old foeman who conquers whom he wills. Abraham Lincoln died as well as Cobden.
Thanks to everyone who helped made Art @ the Domain a success! This was a great show, with enthusiastic crowds and everyone is already looking forward to the October show at the Domain.
Oh, and just in case you’re wondering why I’m focusing on the WWE and not smacking my (expletive) on the crying, abused face of Dixie Carter, it’s because TNA is so mediocre and asinine that they aren’t worthy of my time. With that being said, Part 3 focuses on TNA’s championships.
Apart from some injuries caused by the exit routine itself, thankfully there were no tragedies. Read my Airport Informer report on the incident here ……
Then Alex and I looked at each other, nodded, thanked Buzzkill Man for letting us know, and walked past him. He was not going to ruin the moment for us; he was especially not going to ruin the moment for Lucien. Then we went to get ice cream even though it's November.
Time just flies by. When I glance at the clock and see that it is 9:00, I think of all the things I still want to accomplish before bed. I don't feel pressured or anxious, just excited and full of adrenaline. My prayers about embracing creativity and happiness are being answered right before my eyes. I came across some scripture the other day that I fell in love with:
However, there is no cure.
- The twenty residents that were living in what has come to be known as the Bushwick Trailer Park are now being taken care of by Red Cross. Gothamist
51. Too Many Nights in a Roadhouse -- Junior Brown
Yesterday we spent the day running, walking, biking and just hanging out. Emilee had to work at the North 51 Grill last night so we went there for dinner. I had shrimp tacos, DH had chicken strips (from scratch) and we split wings and fries with another of Em's friends James. He is a riot...and we really enjoyed him and his humor. We went home around 9:30 and Emilee got home at 11:30. It makes for a long day today for her but she is enjoying being back at the 51 Sunday and Monday nights. $$$$
Gert here continuing on with Pilgrim’s comment…
8:15pm, no moon.
30 hours ago, we were perusing the fashion delights in Anthropologie at Lenox, not yet aware of the romping merriment that awaited us that night.
But, I puffed out my chest, and took it all on this past week, with the encouragement of Husband and Daughter, and friends. I was able to spend time with those wonderful friends, and celebrate two memorable occasions....
Three months later I was in Amsterdam, Rotherdam.
Bay Girl catching some ZZZZZs in the field today... she didn't mind me walking around out there either, she just stayed put and slept!
Other homegrown winners include Walton-on-Thames firm Anila’s Sauces, scooping the best ingredients prize for its Goan Green Sauce, which is gluten, nut and dairy free, vegan, and boasts no added sugar. The Indian food brand was set up by Anila Vaghela and husband Dan after she was made redundant in 1997 from her job as a PA.
As a diabetic, carbohydrates are supposed to be my enemy. But they're also my body's main source of energy. It doesn't help that some of my favorite foods are high in carbs: cereal, bread, pasta, and any dessert that was ever created.
+ Cleese's stream of ridiculous nicknames for Sir Edward "Ted/Eddie Baby/Sweetie/Sugar Plum/Angel Drawers/Frank/Fran/Frannie/Little Frannie/Frannie Knickers" Ross.
and like a child again
his police docket that contains evidential material that will
Pop says that guys like them should be drafted into the army. They’d learn ‘em a thing or two.
Arrrrrrrgh....it's days like this that make me stressed but I am not really interested in turning to food so that's a good thing. Before I would think , oh i'm stressed so I have an excuse to pig out.
~ Lao Tzu
Here's what it looked like when I first moved to the city:
Specifically as a writer, I feel I am a pioneer on the adventure of finding new ways to describe things. It’s an eternal journey since I find my description in all my work to be weak. So why would I want to tear someone down for coming up with a new way to call a dog “chair”.
Temple University has about 39,000 students and less than half live on or near campus. Yet Temple University resists the cultural emptiness from which most commuter schools suffer. Why? It’s likely because Temple’s culture is out in its streets, encouraging students to stick around and get involved. At the front of this line, whether they know it or not, are Temple’s food trucks.
But it was your idea!
There are a ton of things I planned to RAMBLE about this morning,
For the chocolate candy looking pieces that adorn some of the cupcakes I used marshmallows. I cut the marshmallows in half and then dipped them in the microwaved frosting. I chilled them in the refrigerator for about 10 minutes so the frosting could harden. Once they were chilled I piped on a candy looking design using the buttercream in a piping bag with no tip. Then I used a toothpick (that I cut in half) to attach them to the cupcakes.
“I can’t let you do that. You guys need to talk. Y’all are having a baby.”
After almost 5 years and 1,112 posts, I've decided to put The BDR on indefinite hiatus.
I pack my bag.
"My center is ever at your assistance." - Bill Shakespeare
Today, you can find me in a couple of places at some of my favorite blogs, hanging out with some of my favorite chicks!
12. Create and nurture ‘the correct culture.’ – RB-“Staff first, then customers and shareholders, Shape the business around the people. Having a personality of caring about people is important. You can’t be a good leader unless you generally like people. That is how you bring out the best in them. For the people who work for you or with you, you must lavish praise on them at all times,” Branson says. “If a flower is watered, it flourishes. If not, it shrivels up and dies. People don’t need to be told where they’ve slipped up or made a mess of something.”
I always love to begin the year with a bouquet of fresh flowers to brighten the first days of January with their beauty and sweet fragrance. Apparently Franny seems to like this tradition as well.
1. Babel Tower – AS Byatt. For the linguists in the crowd, Babel Tower explores themes of language. The third book in the Frederica Potter quadrilogy has our intrepid heroine forging a life for herself in the intellectual circles of 1960s London. Gender and women’s historians will enjoy the re-creation of the limited choices intelligent women had during that time and can debate how much has changed since. You don’t need to read the other books in the quadrilogy to understand this book. The Frederica Potter quadrilogy is a rarity in literature, with its headstrong, generally unsympathetic heroine who makes some horrible choices but never compromises her intellect.
Actually lets lump them all in together: a prediction would be to allow the EU's transaction tax, but to make it only liable on high street banking transactions, not on investment banking.
down in the cold uriniferous subway ...
and penned some of the best
Be free.
More dense maps and sick enemies than ever before: kill over 6,000 uniquely spawned wicked monsters
Another waffly post.
Just one certain person
OK, I know the impression was not too great on this one and it is on embossed paper but after a few goes with my nail file over the surface of the stamp, it works a treat now. HOWEVER, time was short and I couldn't really be bothered to start this one all over again so it is as it is!
Mid-season shows have the advantage/disadvantage of filming all episodes of their order before they finally air. The disadvantage is you can’t make mid-course corrections based on feedback. But the advantage is your cast isn’t plunged into a suicidal depression when bad reviews and/or bad ratings come in. Try producing another eight episodes when that occurs. It’s Baghdad with worse weather. Sometimes it’s best when you’re working in a bubble and everyone is happy and optimistic and fooling themselves.
Do you take time for you?
Must be up this way.
The thing about an Aga is that once the oven door is shut you can’t smell what’s inside. There are no enticing smells wafting from the oven to let people know that dinner’s nearly ready and no olfactory reminders to check whether the cake’s done. Once that door’s shut the seal is absolute until you open the door. It’s on all the time too, so things just carry on cooking. Once the door is opened though you are greeted (sometimes) by smoke and a strong burning smell that you just don’t get very often with other ovens. Many times we have forgotten things in the oven only to find them some hours later – often the next day – totally blackened. Garlic bread looks particularly good after an overnight roasting – its form is retained, but it takes on a shiny, almost plastic look.
The big gator dove stealthily under the water. The Chinese scout advanced cautiously in the direction of a large old Cypress tree with a massive tangle of exposed roots. Pitcher, unmoving and consummately camouflaged, simply waited for his prey.
orders to stay within her protected homeland and ends up in a disastrous situation. Zachariah becomes her unwitting savior, and his actions serve to connect them in a mysterious way. While Tate struggles to get out of her predicament, an evil Mercesti named Eirik is scouring the Estilorian plane in search of a powerful ancient artifact. Ultimately, their fates all connect…with dramatic consequences.
Just celebrated our love of the same music through the contact of salty lips.
Inspired by an appetizer served in a local restaurant, I created my own version of roasting vegetables and combining them with plain hommus and French goat cheese. Wow, this took a dip to a much higher, complex level.
Shows tend to have their characters apply or only talk about applying right before they should hear back from colleges. This makes the storyline in question an contained arc, to happen at a set time in the season for only a , but really…why not drag out the storyline the way it drags out in real life? Have people stressing early on in your season, in the fall, and then you’ve got something to revisit and conclude in the spring, something to tie your season together overall.
As the Rand methodology will not work without company data, the pilot phase will not ‘take-off’ without cooperation from companies and organizations that are willing to contribute actively in building an effective and solidly based policy to tackle IPR infringement. It should be expected that the methodology will produce at least some results—possibly no more accurate than other data that are currently available, yet neutral, which is the aim of the exercise. Through actual testing, Rand and the Commission will learn valuable lessons which should assist in the fine-tuning of the model and in creating alternative methodologies (because the proposed model cannot be applied to non-deceptive IPR infringements—for which an alternative model is paramount, given their importance). However, if not enough companies volunteer, then ‘industry’ may be left holding the bag for the failure of the methodology, which would be undesirable in a climate of widespread criticism of ACTA and every strengthening of IPRs".
What is the purpose with your sellers visit to the customer.
It is just me and my two brothers.”
their wild and savage ferocity and their forest sounds, and African
And my sweet spot is the long run.
06/11/2008
23,000: The Number Of Jobs Obama Knew His Drilling Moratorium Would Kill.( The Wall Street Journal , 8/21/10)
At the moment, I'm enjoying another score, an alt style beer from Unazuki in Toyama-ken. It pours a dark copper color, similar to the Helios pale, and the first sip offered a nice, dry finish after a light caramel malt and hop presence. Now that it's warmed up a little, I'm getting a bit more fruity tones and the beer is growing on me.
Make sure you aren’t running away from your problems, always moving towards something.
A police spokesman said,
Fulham claimed their first-ever victory at Anfield as a much-changed Liverpool side were beaten 1-0 following Martin Skrtel’s early own-goal, while Cameron Jerome came off the bench to equalise against Everton and earn Stoke a 1-1 draw at the Britannia Stadium.
Day 5: I keep writing.
A former head of counterterrorism at the CIA, who was investigated last year by the Justice Department for the destruction of videos showing senior al-Qaeda officials being interrogated, says the harsh questioning of terrorism suspects produced the information that eventually led to Osama bin Laden’s death.
And this is my page for Leah's challenge for the Challenge Heaven Cyber Crop. She wanted us to scrap a few photos showing a span of time. When I was browsing my old photos, I found this one of my little cutie when she was only two and had a big whoop of delight because I had this other one of her on my back 15 years later, taken at Christmas time last year. Yay, I am loving seeing the two photos together like this and I wouldn't have scrapped them together without the challenge, because they were in separate piles. So interesting to do this though. I should do it more I think.
Best Lead Performance, Male:
Good bye, Zai jian, Zai jain I have to go.
Catherine Opie
And . . . Don't mess with old people.
All new "Likers" will be entered into the drawing to win the ARC.
6. EXTRA BONUS Votes. Receive 3 extra bonus votes on your photo each time anyone who is a LIKER The Memories Of Mine Photography Facebook Page votes and leaves a comment on your photo saying “I have clicked the LIKE button for Memories of Mine Photography FB page”
The most recent installment of “The Session” dealt with drinking beers out of season. More to the point, I suspect the beer masses mean drinking heavier beers during the summer. I missed posting on the appointed day. That’s no excuse to flop down and wail like a wee baby. I’m a dark beer kind of fellow and I like it even in hot weather and even a belated excuse to sample dark, strong beer is reason enough to do so.
5. Get your beauty rest
Jesus will help you uncover your wheelhouse too, if you only consider the possibilities.
Grew up mad and antisocial
“Ah…but you sound so American.”
So at 6:15 this morning, I stirred together some oats, applesauce, bananas, cinnamon, and golden raisins (the original recipe calls for Craisins, but in an effort to use ingredients that we already owned, I went wild with the incredibly delicious golden raisins). That’s really all it takes, folks. And that’s good for this very sleepy baker, who can stir all of these together with her eyes still closed.
My daughter notices when I use the phrase, "I'm glad it worked out!"
New Orders Since end of day 07/31/2010, still outstanding as of end of day 08/31/2010
PLEASE SUPPORT THE BAND - Buy their CD:S, T-Shirts, Go see them live in concert...
Orphan ministry comes behind the most important work, which is the "Great Commission," preaching the gospel.
L: Exactly what? I’m asking you why God is a figment of my imagination, your the one who made the claim. I’m curious to know why you think that.
When he writes, ‘Blessed be God the Father who has blessed us,’ he is sitting in a Roman prison; he breaks out in praise despite the fact he’s in lock-down. I find that to be incredible.
Me to self: “Man the arrogance of some of these job seekers.”
And I realize some of you may be having trouble deciding whether I am kidding or not. So from now on I will tell you when I’m kidding.
On this summer solstice, the most luminous day of the year, i’ve decided to publish this piece in his memory and honor. Though now he is no longer with us physically, i believe that this was just another transformation, a rebirth of a different sort. I also post this as a tribute to those of us left behind- for my brother Ryan especially, our extended family, Greg’s friends and loved ones, and all those who have been through hard times and are on the path of being ‘reborn’ and rising to new heights with the hard fought wisdom in hand that comes from struggling and enduring…
g/ Foreign lawyers who possess licenses to practice law in Vietnam which are granted by the Ministry of Justice in accordance with law.
Love Beer. Love Craft. Harpoon
Project), and Andrew Hart (re-introduction of Red Kites into England).
UPDATED: Scroll to the bottom for more info!
It’s freedom
· Bed Making
6. He was nasty and aloof to the people I loved the most.
These are the general rules to entering:
Wolf Hall by Hilary Mantel (in my opinion) thoroughly deserved to win the 2009 Booker Prize for fiction. It also won the National Book Critics Circle award for Fiction, The Walter Scott Prize for Historical Fiction. It was the winner of the Morning News Tournament of Books, Wimbledon and The Eurovision Song Contest. It was beaten in the semi final of the Champions League by Barcelona after a controversial disallowed goal, which once again brought up the issue of the use of goal line technology.
into strips, red bell pepper, onions, salt, pepper, and a little bit
So while I see this buildup of Armageddon happening in the world, I don’t believe it is a forgone conclusion. The possibility is there, on one side, it is happening. There could very possibly be a revolution in this country. The corporations are not going to want to give up their power easily, no matter what the people want.
Titanium Mug
Task 3: set up blog. Tick.
-You are excited for nap time so you can actually get house chores done
And now, friends, you'll never guess what. As those of you who've been there know, pregnancy takes nine months. You can't rush it, and in the meantime, you still have to leave the house.
4)I will exercise daily,with weights as I do now,that stroll in the park gig just doesn't do it for me.....
# Punch a guy who was actually helping you out.
He said on one occasion he was forced wait several hours before a doctor insisted there was no swelling.
Happy days are coming soon —
One of Porsche’s most celebrated nameplates is improving in a very big way for the 2013 model year. Available this summer, the all-new Porsche Boxster looks to once again raise the bar in lightweight performance with a completely revamped chassis, and a body that’s lighter than ever.
"But, then, there are your scenes. Can I tell you something?"
I am sure come tomorrow afternoon we'll be swiveling, spinning, and smiling. Gettin' our salsa groove on; demonstrating flexibility. It will be a great way to spend a rainy Sunday afternoon.
Schrader SM, Kanitz MH. Occupational hazards to male reproduction. Reproductive Hazards. Occup Med State Art Rev 1994; 9: 405-414.
If you have a child that goes to kindergarten school or you are a teacher, you can have kids Halloween polo shirts for your class. You can browse straight through the site and order kids Halloween polo shirts with all sorts of logos and give them to children. They will easily be excited and happy about this and you can also use them if you have organized and event.
And what was the product of this union? A year after Kunti gave birth to Yudishtira (I prefer his other name, Ajatashatru – the one without enemies!), she was still pregnant (after over a year of conceiving) and the jealousy that Kunti had given birth before her drove her mad, and she beat her own womb until a stinking mass of flesh was aborted.
Strict Joy is an album about love gone wrong. Or simply, a breakup album. But that’s the thing with good music. It isn’t just about one thing, or another. It’s something fragile and dangerously personal. Delicately carved stuff, this.
- Pasta 500 g $1.25 each (Catelli)
"I hate binding.."
Viridian
6600 S Paulina St, Chicago, IL 60636, USA
Their core service is developing API for integrating social media campaign tracking tools into a website or App. This allows a current company to build a business model within a customized API to improve their core business strengths within social media services such as Facebook or Twitter.
I'm pretty sure true love is defined as staying up until 2 a.m. to build a piñata with your pregnant wife. Bless my husband for not only going along with my crazy ideas, but doing so with a smile on his face.
Part of my problem is procrastination. I was not a good planner this week. I feel like the most distracted person in the world.
The traveling rock show Sonisphere hits Warsaw, Poland on May 10th, Madrid, Spain on May 25th and the lakefront town of Yverdon-les-Bains, Switzerland on May 30th. Metallica leads this year’s tour, along with Machine Head, Black Label Society, Soundgarden, Slayer and Motorhead playing various dates and venues.
Sunday morning mayhem at St. Patrick's Cathedral at the start of the 20th century. Fifth Avenue became a veritable procession of New York's wealthiest residents. (NYPL)
The massive Terminator knights charged into the fray but their armour meant nought to the mighty dragons and they were slaughtered by tooth and claw. As the warriors fell the Wood Elves closed in further, wiping out a scouting party as they tried to relieve their comrades.
You know I'm all about the mini. They are cute. They are small. And they are all about portion control. Unless you eat 5 of them. Well, let's just focus on the positive.
+ this was my first time at the famous nathan's hot dogs. it was alright, i guess. i suppose if i ever had a craving for hot dogs i would go here. see the person holding the corn dog? that's my older sister, cheryl. isn't she pretty? :)
I always knew writing and editing were different in theory, but only recently did I realize that I was treating them as the same thing.
Dawn reassured me and told me that she has worked with many people diagnosed with Bipolar Disorder. She sees any illness in terms of the soul and said that in her professional opinion she believes there is a huge link between the Bipolar mood swings and repressed anger. It made a lot of sense to me, as I know I was extremely angry with my colleague last August during our arguments, but hadn’t expressed it in any way.
After additional comments on the Fed (none of them positive), Wenzel ends on a delightful note:
as well as the day Henry was sealed to our family.
very lovely - very sumptuous in their look, but very human as
Saw the final dissolution of her metamorphic play
Astronomers say the sun has been relatively quiet for some time. And this storm, while strong, may seem fiercer because Earth has been lulled by several years of weak solar activity.
14 You Brought A New Kind Of Love To Me (Fain, Norman,Kahal) 3:08
then i just slid each circle under my presser foot as i sewed.
Have you ever heard people say, “God is sovereign. He can do anything He wants.” Sure, you have and it is a true statement, to a point. Sovereign means (A ruler with supreme power; Possessing supreme jurisdiction or authority.) Many people are missing the blessings of God because they believe God will do anything He wants to. Multitudes are doing without things that God has promised all because they are leaving everything up to God. Have you ever heard someone say something like, “If I’m supposed to be in heaven, I’ll be there. God is sovereign you know.” Or “if God wants me rich, I’ll be rich. God is sovereign.” Maybe you’ve heard this, “If God wants me healed, He’ll heal me. It’s up to Him.” This is not scriptural. God won’t make our decisions for us.
What I didn't like: While each character was their own separate person, their voices seemed to bleed into one another once in a while. With a voice this strong in the narration, it happens. I've seen it before. The author's sense of humor infects the rest of the characters, and people who didn't even know each other yesterday suddenly share the exact same wit.
and how she came to have that business.
-I never go without earrings that dangle.
Hands down, the best of that movie is when Zac is standing in his black boxer-briefs. If I could freeze any moment in that movie forever, that would probably be it. In fact, that might be the only part of the movie I’ll remember in a few weeks.
- Restoring from a Time Machine backup via AFP does not work
It seems like just yesterday that shameless Goldman Sachs pimp and lying sack of shit Ben Bernanke swore that he would never, ever, evah monetize our debt. As he continued to hand out money like Santa Claus at a Wall Street Christmas Party, we slept.
This is the same feeling I have when I think about attempting to communicate in Spanish with anyone else in the city. I realize I am in a place and a neighborhood that does not see many tourists. This means I cannot expect English to be spoken around here. When I vacationed in certain parts of Mexico that catered to tourists, I knew I could always expect some local vendor to speak English. It was a lifeline and I was happy for it. This is not the case here and I will have to deal with it.
hreyfist ei hár á höfði” the lyrics go (“A quiet world, not a hair stirs...”), evoking
My handheld tools powered by my lifeforce and gravity will have provided the foundation my house will rest upon until it is not more. And that could be a very long time, far longer than the life of the body responsible for it. Because it is not in fact the body that does this work, but the spirit does it through the body. The body is just another tool.
Years before any one else was calling themselves Terror, these guys were playing as Terror. I know very little about these Japanese thrashers. My old Albany friend Louis J gave me this one back in the early 1990's. All he said was "enjoy this Japanese rarity". He was the first guy I'd ever met who went balls out collecting Japanese punk hardcore records. It was like an addiction for the guy. Even back in 1989 he was sometimes paying $75 for records that I thought he was insane for buying. Turned out he was way ahead of his time.
Can you imagine the eclectic mix of the worlds rich and famous
By the time Najib returns, it would be the last week of May, and calling for polls in June will be unlikely from a strategic planning point of view.
All this is part of a plan that I have defined after having passed thru a coaching process in which I have learnt to be able to strategically identify and prioritize professional and personal goals. In this blog I will be talking about insights, strategy and wellness. These three are in some way or another the main elements of the plan.
In honor of World Cardmaking Day I made a card. For those of you who know me this may seem like a shock- Marianne is actually making a card (by hand, not arranged on a computer and mass printed). I know, I know, Marianne is crazy for trying to make a card, but we all should step out of our comfort zone sometimes.
Living in China can have a lot of “What the Heck?!?” moments . Today’s moment was especially hilarious. I was covering some classes for my friend at a teaching center this morning and on my bike ride to work at 8:30 while waiting for the traffic light to turn green I encountered this moment : One guy in a construction workers hat is holding a large live snapping turtle neatly tied up. He was swinging the turtle by the rope and another guy was trying to settle a price for the turtle. The conversation went something like this (although in Chinese) “
Q: “Coffee, tea or hot chocolate?”
I am given to understand that the major cause of diverticules is too much red meat in the diet, which simply doesn't apply in my case at all. I was a vegetarian for years, and I still avoid animal for the most part. Now as a child of the 60's and 70's of course I ate more than my share of cow, but in my case it had been pressure cooked for three hours beforehand. The result might best be described as slippery; I don't see how it could have massed up enough to blow out the colon of a vole, let alone a person. Still, the fact remains. And theres photographic proof.
Gado - gado ( Indonesian and Betawi language ) or also called karedok or Lotek ( Sundanese ) for its cooked epic - differed from lotek atah or karedok for its fresh and untried tale of the vegetable masked shield peanut relish and pecel ( Javanese speaking ) is an Indonesian dish comprising a vegetable salad served bury a peanut dressing sauce. Solid is attention to own originally been a Sundanese dish. Live is widely served from hawkers carts, stalls ( warung ) for sane thanks to prestige restaurants and hotel both prominence Indonesia and worldwide.
song from a 1995 release contains Middle Eastern percussion with
The next day for lunch we made our was down Sunset Boulevard in Hollywood Studios and decided to try a couple of the “Gourmet” Hot Dogs at Fairfax Fare.
She let this go for a long while before one day she told me, “Douglas, just shut up!” It sounds terrible, but she would go on to explain that sometimes you don’t need to point out how amazing something is, that sometimes a look between lovers is enough. That it is enough to just Stop and Think. Instead of consuming the idyllic beauty of something, let it wash over you and exist around you, and it will be there forever.
“hmmm…,” the man says, “I was married to the same woman for 50 years and never cheated on her, even in my heart.”
Divergent by Veronica Roth is a gripping tale set in future Chicago, where the remaining population has separated into factions according to their beliefs on how to keep the peace. Tris, has spent the days up to her choosing ceremony in guilty agony as she decides whether to stay in her quite life among the Abnegation, or live a life of excitement and bravery among the Dauntless. Her choice leads her on a journey of learning who she really is and how much of her old life still lives inside her, unable to be snuffed out. But with tensions raising among the factions, the choice may weigh even heavier on Tris’s heart as her world begins to crumble like the city she lives in.
I was raised in a veritable pickle of a household. We speak three languages. We believe in different gods, some of us uphold a curious syncretism that defies logic and some of us, we don’t believe at all. We fear the wrath of a pantheon of gods, while some of us respectfully stand in the sidelines, amused but compliant to the arcane rituals that map our faith. Despite the contradictions and occasional absurdity, we co-exist and we keep celebrating each other’s holidays because festivities are always welcome.
Back with 'fence'
And once he was on a plane, shuttling between New York , Jakarta , and Karachi , what passport was he offering when he passed through Customs and Immigration?
A Winter Vignette
A picture of the classic line-up 'B' circa 1966 can be seen in Crypt's Back From The Grave Vol. 1 - the on-stage shot was taken at manager Terry Lee's "Night Train" club in Elizabeth, P.A.
flagrant weakness
To a melting of green waters, till no snake
25. Your mood? buoyant
You let yourself feel guilty, but I never could
Under the technical term of his use of the word urban in his quote, Romney was implying that all of the best schools are located out in the country, and he was going to help all City children get to any of those great schools they want to attend out in the country.
I have enrolled Henry in a mainstream summer camp starting next week where he will go two half-days a week with his younger sister, in hopes of introducing him to a more mainstream setting. He will also still get two half-days of SSD summer school.
You are precious in His sight. You are worth dying for. You belong to Him. You are His child. His love for you is immeasurable and unending and unconditional…
William F. Ballhaus, Sr.
Ranking as the 5th most challenged book in 2010 was the extremely popular Hunger Games. An early challenger was a parent who petitioned to have the book removed from schools due to it being unsuitable for an age group and violence. Apparently her 11-year-old daughter was having nightmares after reading it. It was also challenged due to being “sexually explicit” but I’ll get to that later.
Cassel may not be a worker, but he’s every bit the criminal as the rest of his family. He’s a con-man. He’s always playing the angles. But he doesn’t realise the angles being played on him. White Cat is the slow unravelling of his life as he sees that he’s been the victim of a con far exceeding anything he’s played, and the story’s about his attempts to turn the tables on the other players.
So, I took it from my shelf to re-read it, for the first time since I'd been a teenager. Well, I wasn't wrong about the gore. (Who says modern YA fiction is shocking? Blimey!) High tension? Well, maybe, but you had to read a LOT of words first and unpick reams of long paragraphs and complex sentences. It's turgid prose, with masses of subordinate clauses. The opening paragraph consists of a single sentence of 148 words.
This recipe is adjustable for quantity and taste and is very versatile. Measurements are estimates. It's a great way to use the beans and rice left over from dinner two or three nights ago. Thanks to Chasten R. for this recipe who shared it during our Bean Fair in November, 2009.
128And make my soul quit Abelard for God.
Here's the area higher up. What you can't quite see in the photo is that on the right a gully is forming and all the dirt washed down and blocked up the ditch, so water that was coming down the ditch went down the side of the hill instead; this is probably where most of the water came from that ended up in my house.
Now, they look like this:
“Thank you. So after this, you will…?” Mother looked hopeful.
10. "Diamonds Made from Rain"
Here then is his recipe:
Losers, Boozers and Heros by fIREHOSE
My father died some years ago and I spread his ashes on the beach he loved to walk.
I've struggled somewhat to describe succinctly what exactly the Dark Mountain Project is when people have asked, but I hope that what I've written above conjures something of the spark in me that it feels akin to.
Have you enjoyed the fact that he doesn't have that annoying heartbeat under your ear when you rest your head on his chest?
Another initiative not mentioned at today’s hearing is the realization of more than $2.7 million in savings to taxpayers and $18.8 million in cost avoidance savings from innovative and efficiency driven cost-savings initiatives implemented by the Department of Social Services. DSS also recently won a $100,000 competitive grant from New York State to fight welfare waste, fraud and abuse.
"nine ninety nine," he said
Governments DO for themselves.
Dang, I don't know why I just feel like crawling back into bed right now. I do not want to exercise. I do not want to go to the store. blah. It is really chilly and rainy and breezy....just the kind of day that was made for going back to bed. Or baking cookies. blah.
Finally Catherine was encouraged to take a lover and she bore the first of her three children – fathered by three different men, none of them her husband, according to Massie. It was a boy and the delighted Empress Elizabeth immediately seized custody.
Voter 2
Coaches are realizing or at least they should how thorny these situations can become. You can bet other coaches are using these situations against them in recruiting too.
For a fictionalized representation of psychopathic seduction, check out my new novel, The Seducer, previewed on the links below:
movement along the fault lines
How long were you in the Arctic?
at the cinema of the open mall of the Village Market a short drive
P.S. I made this photo sometime around midnight last night while in the midst of a most trying tax calculation. The photo didn’t turn out well….and John said that I should be embarrassed to post it. So we’ll be making another batch this weekend and try to make these Treats look as yummy as they really are.
Yep! It’s my birthday. Today, I turn 54. It seems I share birthdays with Pope Innocent XII (1615), Emperor Joseph II (1741), British Prime Minister Charles Earl Grey (1764), Astronomer Percival Lowell (1855), John “Home Run” Baker (1886) (that one made me happy!), Orchestra leader Sammy Kaye (1910), L Ron Hubbard (1911) (egad!), Saxophonist Sammy Kaye (1913) (TWO Sammy Kayes?), CIA Director William Casey (1913), Allan Jaffee, cartoonist for MAD Magazine (1921) (another one that made me happy), Mike Stoller, composer (1933), of Lieber and Stoller, (they wrote “Charlie Brown”)
Champion’s parents have sued the company that owns the bus where the hazing took place.
Finally we had time to spend with family, both our Tucson family and members of my immediate family who were in Tucson for Stephanie’s wedding. Staying at Loews Ventana Canyon Resort with us, we were able to see my brother and sister-in-law, Carl and Faith and also my parents, Roger and Gerrie Triemstra. Spending time by the pool, surrounded by gorgeous blooming cacti, streams, and waterfalls was a special pleasure for me as well as having time alone with Rick.
Once again each segment of the overall unit ends in a small interactive game type activity. This particular activity was a game of memory.
The end result of Manuel's policies is that South Africa has become bankable as its credit worthiness has continuously improved overtime, with all the major rating agencies - Moody's, Standard & Poor's, and Fitch - consistently upgrading its credit rating. This enabled the government to borrow at cheaper rates to finance expenditure not adequately covered by tax revenues.
Seriously, I needed one of these, one with room to write
Fasting is a natural healing therapy.It is done for religious/ spiritual reasons as well as for health reasons.These days many fast in the name of different diets are observed,thus abstaining from different food stuffs.
If you blog about beer, and if you read this blog, it's because you're interested in this evaluative process, to a greater or lesser degree. You can now have yourself certified [insert joke here] as Possessor Of Beer Knowledge by The Beer Academy, who are running a series of "How To Be A Beer Judge" courses all over our beer-soaked isle. You can have a look at the schedule here. I'm particularly pleased to see that the Leeds course appears to be nearly full, which means that by the time the European Beer Bloggers Conference hits town in May there will be a sector of the local populace, distinguished no doubt by gowns and mortarboards, who are able to talk about why a beer is either awesome or bogus with reference to appropriate evaluative language. You never know, it might bring you a step closer to that hallowed gig of paid writer.
The group raised a collective quizzical eyebrow. She explained:
"Today I am thankful for God's adoption of me into his family. He looked at my life's file and saw all the selfishness, and anger and ugliness of my past and present, and he still chose to pursue spending eternity unconditionally loving me as his child. I pray he will give me the strength, grace and mercy to do the same."
And you’re two months back in the middle of March.”
The desire for marriage is a fair request, but the consequences of living in a fallen world can prevent people from reaching that goal. For instance, you can pursue someone romantically, but that individual may choose to ignore you, a crisis or illness could hinder you, or that person may decide to leave you. The sins of humanity create numerous barriers to good relationships.
When Christ speaks a word to us then trusting Him involves trusting that we are the people Christ says we’ve become. Jesus says to you:
However, the spokesman said no racist comments had been directed at the victim.
Blogging, now. That’s slightly different: blogging is kind of like writing–only you get to show your readers a little at a time. That’s a lot easier than telling an (unknown) potential audience what you thought you were writing about.
In 1605, Henry Morgan was heavily involved in the Gunpowder plot to blow up Parliament, for which crime he was hanged the following year in Stafford. Piers tried something almost identical at the Leveson Enquiry, and was on this occasion hoist by his own badinage.
I Thank you all, for finding my life and creations interesting enough to read and for all of the wonderful comments I have received.
Amanda checked her emails.
If you do much outdoor photography, I’d recommend getting some polarizing filters early on, especially before you’re really comfortable doing post-processing on your images. They can give your image a punch and give you some control that you might otherwise be lacking under a lot of shooting conditions. You can tame glare and reflections, saturate your colors better and more evenly across the whole scene, and tamp down the risk of losing shots because they end up way too washed out or ruined by haze. I can’t wait to get out with mine and experiment some more. Just remember to take them off before you try and do any indoor/nighttime/dim light shots!
The story does not reveal if Harry and Horsie's real life home is in the city, but that information is really not very important. Although there are nods to New York City, the city in CookieBot! is pure imagination. After all, any good futuristic science fiction tale with an over sized villain takes place in the city, right? Think Godzilla! Think... okay, I can't think of any more, but my point is that in our popular imagination, giant robots do not crash through the woods or the flower garden. They terrorize innocent urban populations who run down streets flanked by skyscrapers!
I really hope lil' miss decides to stay head down. Surely it's harder to flip up than it is to flip down, right? I mean, it's harder to get up from a headstand than it is to get down into a headstand.
Title: Athena the Brain
 Teachers/faculty of winning school – the option to wear school appropriate jeans or shorts and sneakers for the entire last week of school!!
Grease a 9x13 pan. Melt the butter or margarine over medium heat. Add the marshmallows and keep stirring until they're all melted. Add the Biscoff spread (it will seem tough at first, but keep stirring and it'll all soften up). Once everything is combined, remove from the heat and quickly stir in the cereal. Spread the cereal mixture evenly in the greased pan (it works great if you butter your hands). Sprinkle with the spiced sugar. Let cool for 1-2 hours. Drizzle with the melted white chocolate. It tastes even better the day after you make it.
When President McKinley is shot, Vice President Roosevelt rushes to a deathbed inauguration.
After playing Caldwell returned to North Carolina where he eventually became pitching coach of Campbell University after Cal Koonce, keeping that gig from '87 to '91. He then moved back to the Brewers system, where he was a coach from '93 to 2001. After a year as a manager - he went 60-80 - he moved to the Detroit system from '05-'06 and then to the Giants one from '07 to the present. He is currently the pitching coach of the AZL Giants in Scottsdale.
“We will get answers at an appropriate time,” Brodsky continued.
STORING: Packed airtight, cookies will keep at room temperature for up to 3 days; they can be frozen for up to 2 months.
And hopefully, if I get some of this crap off of my to-do list, I'll be able to concentrate on what I'm there for: you know, taking care of sick people and not screwing up.
"Who Do You Love"
Where the copyright owner's accusation of infringement is not based on facts and where the accused infringer claims for the damages because of injury it or he has suffered due to the measures taken by the Internet service provider, the people's court shall decide to order the person giving the warning to be liable the damages.
My daughter and her boyfriend absolutely adored the Avengers, but when I said I wanted to see it, they informed me that I had to watch both Iron Mans, Captain America, and Thor so I would be up to speed. Well I've squeezed them all in and hope to see the Avengers sometime this weekend.
In Yemen, a series of riots and lootings took place in 1931 and 1947 (with eighty people killed). An accusation of ritual crime was levelled against the Jews in Sana'a in 1948.
Where: Concord Baptist Church of Christ
This is how it was last month:
Mr Walker complied and drove into the car park. He parked outside the building in a space without any road markings or double-yellow lines.
The diners never needed any additional salt on their meals either...
I want to be a happy and energetic mother to my daughter…
This was the most beautiful Christmas I can remember. Clear, crisp winter days and calm, frosty nights. A perfect holiday at home. The view of the snow on the Butterpots is just breathtaking.
Traveller’s cheques, while previously sought out for their ‘less chance of being ripped off’ abilities, became too much of a hassle in exchanging, and as such have pretty much died out.
We went in to the ring in Level 1B and kicked butt, taking a perfect score and the fastest time for first place in the class.
Size of Baby: Kumquat (I've never even seen one of these)
How does this related to red blood, I hear you ask? Well, maybe not, since on the whole people who read writing blogs are pretty smart, so you've probably already figured it out. ANYway.
Both Chinese medicine and Indian Ayurveda maintain the importance of eating the different foods that are appropriate for the seasons in which they’re grown and harvested.
It’s been a rough few days here. The tummy bug that Ashlin had Saturday made its way through the entire house. Stu first, then me, then Teagan. Neither Stu nor I are quite right, yet. Yes, we are the house of plague. Teagan wasn’t entirely sure why she was feeling so bad, but she was glad she wasn’t throwing up any more. Throwing up in her sleep really upset her. Rightfully so. She snuggled in the morning, and then after a three hour nap, she asked to go to day care. She was feeling much better, but we were feeling green, oh, so green. Yes. We let her go (Stu drove her in). We are bad parents. The kind of parents that you hate, but she’d been puke free for at least 4 hours, and had oh, way too much energy for me, and Stu to deal with. We figured that since she’d been there the day before, everyone was already infected, if she was contagious. And those few hours she was there were lovely. I slept most of it, and felt almost ready to deal with her and her sister. Well, except for heating up their dinner. That I couldn’t do.
I believe it is fair to speculate that we have once again taken another step down the Age of Austerity ladder. This is at least the fourth or fifth big one since the crisis of 2009 I think and each one is coming sooner than the last and the distance down is increasing slightly with each step just as many said it would.
Sentiment Ticket - Whimsy.
6-Abandoned
I think I’m running out of options so am eating all the carbs in the house because I’m a canny Scot who doesn’t want to see anything go to waste; there’s still some mashed potatoes and white flour left (though that’s actually out of date – but who takes any notice of dates?).
I will tell you all that scheduling the studio time proved to be a problem. I was able to work alone the first time and I thought I could do it the second time. I went to the studio as some of my classmates were leaving, and they told me emphatically that I would absolutely NOT be able to work alone. Two of them helped me set up and one of them stayed with me and assisted me in adjusting the lights throughout the shoot. I can't tell you how grateful I am to him for being such a gentleman and sticking around to help me. I really could NOT have done it without him. One other person I have to give credit to is my beautiful daughter who was my model. It was a long process and she was tired and hungry and only lost patience once I was already done with the shoot. For Isabella that is quite an accomplishment. The project was to do one low key portrait and one high key portrait. For those of you who don't know, "low key" means primarily dark tones and "high key" means primarily light tones. So without further ado here are the two portraits I turned in for my grade.
“But Papa”, said the young girl. “I know I came from Mommy’s belly and you both wanted a little girl like me, I just want to know where I came from… before that?”
at your anger, confusion and delusions of grandeur.
Crystal 60˚, 8 oz.
Out of nowhere men arrive
How is bedtime at your house? Is it cool, calm and collected? Ours is not. Our bedtime is wild and crazy. We send all the kids to bed at the same time (9:30), even though Max and Jack complain that isn't fair because they are older and should get to stay up later. I don't dispute that; if they want fair and balanced, they can call Fox News. John and I thought about letting the boys stay up later than the girls, but that would just cut into our alone adult time, and we certainly don't want that.
Okay, I know it's been pretty much forever since I've posted, but music school is keeping me on a short rein so there's been a severe art lag from my end, which usually happens this time of year anyways... however, there is some EXCITING news.
Hi everyone! I've really missed creating cards with floral images and this one so reminds me of spring. I'm also loving this Thrift Shop Paper Pad so I'm sure you'll be seeing more of it. The image used on today's card is the Flower Basket digital stamp by Clear Dollar Stamps.
For starters, there was no guarantee the owls would be worth anything – they first had to be checked. And to check them, taking one owl and checking it would have been sufficient to determine if it was worth climbing back up to retrieve the other two; the nest wasn’t going anywhere, and the little chickens were too small to fly.
"In any case, you're a prosecution witness. They will try to present it as a deliberate, murderous attack, and it's not in your interest to introduce interpretations like this one."
Sent from my mobile device
Does this mean I'd be better if I trained with someone else? Personally, I like the simplicity of running or biking whenever I want to, rather than having to arrange times, wait for people, and travel to somewhere convenient. But perhaps my competitive nature would drive me to train harder.
we watched one another
Brought on an energy of healing,
1. cutting a 3/4" circle from Lacy Labels
Steer Clear Of Remaining Conned By Payday Advance Firms!
· Asking a bartender to put a shamrock on the top of a well-poured Guinness is like asking Da Vinci to put a mustache on the Mona Lisa.
SAY YOU LOVE ME
I gave up for a while, previewing the collections online and always being disappointed that even if I did love a piece (like Zac Posen‘s red convertible dress) it was no doubt not carried in my Target.
8. Tomorrow has enough to worry about and doesn’t need my help.
(pp. 37-38)
The ribbon is from stash and the sentiment is craftwork cards.
WHITE RIVER: I’ve spent a bunch of days on the river with the rest of the guide team, fishing with old friends and a couple of new ones and its been good.
God is known–through knowledge and through unknowing.
Do you ever have conversations in your head with someone? The other day, Imaginary Drew was asking me which of my parents was my favorite. This may be an actual conversation that’s happened out loud at some point. I thought I would have an answer for Imaginary Drew (I don’t like getting into fake conversations when I don’t know exactly what my platform is), but it turned out I had no idea which is my favorite parent.
In this love's hallow'd temple, this soft bed.
Nine different duty stations (I don’t even know where I am!),
I also pray that Stephanie will have a good day and get some homework done for her next meeting with her homebound teacher. I pray that I will have a good day at work today, better than yesterday.
And so it is with the life of a writer—or anyone, for that matter. New callings and opportunities arise. The seemingly constant path becomes weathered and worn. And roads untraveled call to us to move on.
Don’t get me wrong, I’m not saying that women are incapable of doing what men can… Conjestina, Leyla Ali and half of Semenya have proven that really well. Were quite capable. But one thing we’ve never understood is that equality is nothing but a pipe dream. If it wasn’t then we should be beaten. Yes! If women want equality so badly then if your husband doesn’t like your cooking then he should be allowed to jab you a GOOD one! But that doesn’t mean that you shouldn’t pick your ass off the floor and beat him as well. And then all sports should be mixed! Leyla Ali vs Lennox Lewis… (Or…whatever, I don’t know a thing about boxing.)
PR Contact: Mimi Rossi +1 818.303.8088
I’m already beginning to realise that all the little snacks I’ve passed up on so far have so many unnecessary calories etc. Its the little things that make a difference and I’m hoping by making these small changes that they’ll start adding up to a big overall change!
'Well, let me show you here in the annual." She slowly turned each page until she got to the football section. She looked at each photo carefully until her fingers punctuated her find with a hard tap.
For those of you who have lost touch with Lenny, he has continued singing on tour throughout the U.S., Europe and South Africa sharing the stage with Aretha Franklin, Alicia Keys, K-Jon, Anthony Hamilton, The Whispers, Rick James, Boney James, Bobby Womack, Ohio Players, Al Green, Usher, Frankie Beverly and Maze.
Oscar Gustav Rejlander (1 albumen, 1857)
An acquaintance of mine defended Bourdain recently saying that he "walks the walk." He has tons of experience in professional kitchens. He has written cookbooks. He travels everywhere and eats all of the food. He is serious. He means business. He has been there and done that and has earned the right to act the way he does because he does things no one else will do. I say that's fair enough, but just because not everyone has walked his walk doesn't mean their experience isn't valid.
Happy 75th Mr. Carter and thank you for the great music and inspiration
08-Dennis Brown-Concentration
We have a NEW CHALLENGE for you this week at THE PIXIE COTTAGE and it is GREEN and GORGEOUS – in honor of Earth Day on Sunday, April 22 – and/or sketch. As usual, we have an AMAZING sketch from our fabulous DT leader Katie Tate. We do hope you will come play along.
Elijah's Coins
Now, without further ado… #20 to #11 of Kaitlyn Fung and Nicole Yu’s Top 20 Internet Memes!
-”A woman’s soul is as harmonious as a river’s ripple .You must find out what you did to disturb it son, and appease her.”
By Loving.
I’m still a bit hesitant when ever we perform this piece because I’m always afraid that the pianists in the audience will storm out of the hall, offended that I’ve ruined one of Brahms’ greatest piano works. Thankfully, I’ve been pleasantly surprised when pianists come up to me afterwards saying how “Brahmsian” the transcription sounds and how the voicings of the Quartet are wonderfully exposed in a way that is practically ideal. I just hope that when I die, Brahms will say that he was pleased with my transcription.
** Word verification on blogs. WHY? WHY? WHY? What purpose does it serve? More work for us? To prove we can enter the secret code?
Malis, a marketing and business development consultant, and her partner, Marie McIlwrath, an educator, had been making matches on their own for years. They teamed up a year ago to launch Make Me a Match, a highly personalized matchmaking service based in the Boston area.
My wonderful family.
Five minutes later,he hears a thud followed by a scream ,and rushes frantically to the kitchen.She is lying on the floor in a little pool of blood,articulating,gurgling words,trying not to choke on them.He hears something to the effect of calling his brother.Or his mother.He couldn’t care less.And another upsurge of buried memories swirls in the whirlpool of his psyche.A packet of condoms in her room – opened,used.That didn’t need any explanation.
“I wish I had spent more time at the office.”
- NYX matte lipstick: 20% off
As an official Iron Girl triathlete, I will point out that the race is still pretty tough. After completing Iron Girl last year, I’ve signed up for it again this year, as well as two more races–one sprint and one international. Iron Girl opens the doors to possibility so it’s safe to say the warm fuzzies and bonding have helped me believe that somewhere in my future is a Half-Ironman and perhaps even Ironman.
Steelers are merely factory workers employed in an industry that’s shipping most of its jobs overseas. I’m not sure what Titans are, though — unless I miskeyed their name into Google — they appear to be an outfit of sixteenth-century Italian painters. I’m thinking the Titians’ loose brushwork and subtlety of polychromatic modulations without precedent in the history of Western art will be too much for a group of working class stiffs from the Rust Belt.
In the very fertile valleys of Doucheness, among the hill tops and reigning over the small douche serfs lives Gilby Clarke, an Elder douche if there ever was one. Some people might actually remember Gilby and if they do, they probably would still pump gas if that were still a career option, watched Rock Star Super Nova or finger bang their kittens with Quiet Riot as theme music.
Andy Osnard: Plus what?
When picking out popcorn it really pays to read the label – take a close look at the fat content and ingredients list before putting it in your trolley. Pay close attention to the serving sizes as brands such as Indian Kettlecorn and SmartFood Popcorn appear to have close to the same nutritional make up as the microwavable pop-your own type – but in reality it is almost double (as the portion size is much less).
So Sandra Fluke thinks she can be a big-shot Community Organizer and organize Prostitutes? Let’s break that down, as she wants to have sex with various Partners and she wants US to pay for her needs. So freeloader Sandra Fluke and the lowlife Liberals don’t like the word that Rush Limbaugh called her. Can we “pretty up” the word and use Hooker or Prostitute? Well Prostitutes get paid for sex hence they can buy their own contraceptives.
Some traffic engineers have attempted to apply the rules of fluid dynamics to traffic flow, likening it to the flow of a fluid in a pipe. Congestion simulations and real-time observations have shown that in heavy but free-flowing traffic, jams can arise spontaneously, triggered by minor events (“butterfly effects”), such as an abrupt steering maneuver by a single motorist.
And there's a character that I'm very suspicious of, but I also suspect that it's clever writing that's making me suspicious and that he may well turn out to be a red herring too. No spoilers, please, Mette.
As most dance judges and dancers know, critiques on costuming means the dance is such a lost cause-piece-of-shit not even worth trying to comment on. But put Heather Morris in a tight jumpsuit made of any material and the case is different. I appreciated the Glee costume designers and their dedication to the traditional outfits of B. Spears.
And we see, if we take any one particular country that received the Gospel, how over the centuries it brought forth fruits. It had saints, the lives of people were completely changed, and there was a total difference between the time that country was pagan and the time it accepted Orthodox Christianity. If you take any country in the West, such as Britain or France, or in the East, such as Byzantium or Syria or Russia, you will see that this is the case.
Which is why today was so odd. I was there, looking blank, with a sign. The people who were looking for me saw the sign. They decided not to make themselves known to me.
Things feel so good the way they are, don’t they?
Our latest minute-by-minute report comes to you from my Dad, fresh from an argument, who politely points out that he hates my Mum for her relentless mind games and the spiteful venom that emanates from her very soul. While I listen to my Mum crying in the bath as I worry that this is somehow all my fault and the other children will bully me for not having a proper family, I hand over the reigns to my Dad, who needs to CALM DOWN. Dad, seriously. Cool it. (You can use my laptop if you want, but just do a half-decent write-up on the game, I can’t really be bothered now. I’ve already written an intro for you, but obviously delete this bit in brackets first.)
Melt butter in large saute pan, add the beans and saute until just tender. Add the garlic and fresh ginger and saute about 1 minute. Add the candied ginger and nuts, toss, Season with salt and pepper. Serve warm.
Well, the time has already come to attack another Rollin film. Granted this one isn’t actually credited to Rollin. It’s credited to some kind of Rollin-Laserna hybrid called J.A. Laser. Anyways, “Le Lac des Mort Vivants” a.k.a. “Zombie Lake” is supposedly the worst of the Aquatic Nazi Zombie movies (yes, it is actually a recognized sub-genre), but we’re here to find out if there is any truth to that claim. It’s a pretty dismal playing field from what we’ve seen, so being the worst would be quite an accomplishment. Let’s do this. At least we won’t need subtitles because of our aforementioned French speaking capabilities. Oh yeah, this was produced in 1981…
In a later affidavit, an agent noted that between 2004 and 2009, the average EBT redemption for stores of Stryker Market’s size was about $322,800, but EBT transactions at Ansari’s store totaled more than $3.1 million.
against God.
Mr. Dawes also posted a copy of The Weekly Mail, the Mail & Guardian’s former name, from 1986 in which lines of an article were blacked out because of government censorship. It was routine practice in those days, Mr. Dawes said.
- When the tiles in your bathroom go mouldy, shrug and leave the mould to spread
A moving buddy: if you don’t have one, get one. –Woody (Toy Story)
After a bunch of filler, we get to the halfway point in the show and Kelly Clarkson is on singing with some guy in a cowboy hat. I'm always happy to see the Idols come home. I also like that instead of the one craptacular group sing, they're breaking them up into duets and smaller groups to perform on the results nights.
Everyone has their own unique requirements for the fulfillment of each of the six human needs. The degree to which those requirements are being met in a positive, high quality and sustainable way defines the overall quality of life
After the Lock In, I became insufferable. I would "witness" to my friends and family--preaching to them about what my faith meant to me...how good salvation felt...and how, they too, could join me in Heaven if they'd just agree to accept Jesus as their Lord. I prayed obsessively. I tried, with all my heart, to be the model Christian I felt like Jesus and The Youth Minister wanted me to be.
I recall when I was teaching in Binatang Govt school,
June 14, 2009 Special Dispatch No.2401
So, Kady O’Malley is probably correct that Elections Canada (EC) doesn’t want to admit that since it didn’t charge Michael Moore with illegal door knocking in 2008 (and previously for comments during the 2004 election), it can’t exactly charge other Americans supporting the CPC with doing essentially the same thing. Taken by itself, it could just be two misguided Americans, ignorant of a somewhat obscure and unused law, and mercy could be shown by EC as it apparently was for Moore. The problem is, it cannot be taken by itself anymore. The damned law must be enforced. There is a forest of fraud, and the trees must be acknowledged.
Once I understood that breaking the cycle of over breathing is essential to overcoming asthma naturally, I could draw on all my years of experience with pranayama. I experimented with breathing techniques to see what would restore my natural breath rhythm. Over time I settled on a handful of exercises that were both simple and effective at slowing my breath rate and reducing the incidence and severity of my asthma. There are certain precautions to consider as you embark on this program. The program may ultimately reduce your dependence on medication or enable you to do away with it altogether, but this should not be done hastily or without the approval of a doctor. If you have diabetes, kidney disease, or chronic low blood pressure, have had recent abdominal surgery, or are pregnant, you should consult with your physician before doing these exercises, I also strongly suggest that asthmatics avoid additional breathing exercises which call for rapid breathing (kapalabhati/bhastrika), retention of the inhalation (antara kumbhaka), or tightening the throat (strong ujjayi). Asthmatics must realize that many breathing exercises which are quite beneficial for a normal breather may have a paradoxical impact on an asthmatic, and also do Jal-Neti, Ghrit-Neti, Gomukhasana, Matshyasana daily with above exercises.
Then just a few exits away on I-95 the New Jersey Devils and Philadelphia Flyers are growing their rivalry with each game. They are also tied 1-1 and its anybody’s guess who will win this series. The Flyers were definitely the favorite going in because of the way they took out the Penguins in the first round but it doesn’t look like the Devils are backing down from a fight. After 2 periods of hockey last night the Devils looked like they had given up but whipped out 4 goals in the 3rd period to shock the Flyers. The Flyers looked like a team that lost their way in the last period of the game and for that I would be scared.
"You are Americans", he screamed at us.
Liz and Stuart got married at Rook Lane on Saturday 22nd October. They liked the idea of an autumn wedding – a crisp, sunny morning with auburn and golden leaves adorning the trees…
This is a complex question, and without trying to review all of the factors in how we got here (but for those that wish for some of that here's a good Fresh Air interview), we can apply a powerful concept to discriminate whether this kind of nuclear power, or future kinds, are really worthwhile.
Fostering the delusion that only “I” is important, that me and mine must come before us and ours, the ego makes us believe we are something, that this something is different, special and unique, and that we are separate from everything and everyone else. When we become aware of our essential unity and oneness with all beings, then the ego becomes redundant and loses its job. It will, therefore, do whatever it has to in order to perpetuate its employment.
- 1 tsp salt
TOTAL 4,331
But then, one glorious day, I walked through a model home (one of my favorite things to do!), and found IT!!
/release will release your IP address so your machine can be freed up to access another IP address. /flushdns will purge the DNS cache. /renew will renew your IP address to a good IP address.
the house.
Dunsborough is wonderful to get away too... nothing like spending a few days in such tranquil surroundings.
~ Spoon into a 9" tube pan by sequence. Gently shake the pan alittle to even the top.
But the most fantastic and exciting event of the night was ice dancing! The final portion of the ice dance competition, the free dance would finally determine who would win the gold! And would this be history in the making? Would North America finally knock Russia off the gold? This was an epic war for dominance, and all the athletes brought out their best!
You'll get a bonus point (good for a cyber-hug!) if you share some little detail about the person that you've incorporated into your card...an inside joke, favorite color, favorite image, etc.
I'm realistic enough to know that we won't see the scrapping of local government any time soon, and that there are counter arguments to the above, principally that we should deal with the weaknesses in the current local government set up rather than scrap it. In my next blog post I will discuss the my thoughts on how local government can be improved.
1/2 C All purpose flour
In the future we want to see women need a strong and equal voice; this means being involved NOW. It’s just a matter of finding a voice amongst all this. I don’t want to be belittled for what I can and cannot do. I want to be able to shape the world too. If not for me, but certainly for future generations of women. If I were to have a daughter in the future, what kind of world would I want her to grow up in? One of choice and positivity, or one of male dominated gloom?
take a look at what i WON - *ekk* - so fun saying that "i won" - OVER the moon!
...Grace's little cupboard which is still yet to be painted - I tried last weekend and it was so hot the paint was drying quicker than I could brush! While this colour is not quite right for Grace's bedroom where I'd prefer a pale blue, it is growing on me... a colour option for those kitchen stools of mine perhaps?
“Your hair is short and thin,” I reminded him. “You said I should make you look like you really do.”
Just outside the gardens there is a large tree house, most of it is a restaurant but there are some wobbly bridges to charge around, we ate there later in the week when we had the bad snow. The meal was gorgeous.
We eventually all went off to bed for a snug, peaceful nights sleep. I think I awoke at about 5am to a chorus of cackling kookaburras then some black crows chimed in with their Ark, Ark, Ark song! Why so early?
I had a summer "to do" list but I only managed to get a few things crossed off.. I guess the closets, garage, and photo albums will have to wait until next summer!
*Have Home Depot cut the 4x8 beadboard sheet in half
Sorry, but it’s not.
The hatred of Christians towards Jews started 2000 years before culminated in the 6 million gross killings of Jews by Germany during Hitler time during 1939-1945, with irrevocable consequences of strong Jewish desire to create state of Israel, middle eastern problems, current terrorism and host of many things. The creation of Israel in the majority Arab areas led to continuous terrorist attacks on Israel with Israel responding with force against Jihadi targets leading the entire Asia in to hot bed of terrorism. It all came because of erroneous assumptions of early Christianity that Jews are killers of Jesus Christ. Generation after generation century after century the hatred towards Jews never receded. Why ? Christianity never believes in consequences of human actions as they do not believe in continuum of life or theory of reincarnation. Their belief that just this is last life and after this we will be in a permanent hell till the judgment day when god resurrects all and saves those who followed him led to one of the most dark ages of human progress where Church banned all science, technology, burned scientists, astrologers, magicians as devils and millions were killed during the process. Except Christian religious books, every treatise on mathematics, astronomy etc are prohibited and added to the banned list of books. This situation continued until the age of renaissance from where the current scientific process developed. Many Christian leaders in west and east even today believe that earth is flat and revolves around Sun.
mark). The promotional graphics that have been made public (see for instance
18. My husband has fallen asleep, have you????
This CDV of an unidentified, fashionable young woman from New York City was most likely taken around the late 1870's to the early 1880's. I base this on several factors. First is the thickness of the card and the single rounded border. Secondly, photographer imprints on the back of the card became complex covering the back between 1870 and 1890. The type of pose, a closeup bust covering 3/4 of the print tended to dominate CDV's between 1874 - 1890. Her hairstyle was very popular of the later 1870's woman with curls on the forehead and up-swept bun. Additionally, the fashion of the 1870's trended towards high elaborate collars with much lace and trim about the neck. It seemed the fussier the better. Note her very fashionable hat with feathers and attached to her hair somehow to keep it to the side. She also has what appears to be flowers in her hair and is wearing an elaborate necklace with perhaps a locket.
"Spider offers up an enjoyable pairing of sour yeast, Belgian fruits and chocolate undertones. "
I don't want to wreck the show for those who haven't seen it, but I do have to specify that an alien power has come to earth and is demanding a tribute of children: 10% of the world's population of children, in fact. "Absurd!", you say. Well, of course. But mark how the writers deal with this somewhat improbable premise.
I NEED PROOF. Show me some stinking quotes some articles make this an actual discussion and not just some “you ignorant fools” tirade which it pretty much already has been.
Do not hesitate to draw. If you are somewhere you are supposed to be and someone appears who is not supposed to be there like a closed business show him the end of your gun. Could it be Mother Teresa looking for her lost cat behind your closed business? No it is some motherfucker up to no good. He won't call the police to report he was prowling a location when a guy ran him off.
At this point in time having realized what was in store for me, I would have quite happily declined but my Indonesian friend Dani said “Great! I always wanted to try that.” As he was paying and we had at least an hour to kill before dinner, I jumped right in. To the water that is! Feet first as one might say!
The Smilers are androids, mounted in booths all across the space faring version of Britain that left Earth in the 29th Century. They let people know what's good and what's bad. The terrified population keep them clean. Their heads can rotate to show three faces: happy; warning or very dangerous indeed.
But.. we don’t have to let it go. And if we do, God doesn’t require us to go on another retreat just to get it back. God calls us each and every morning to be His servant. And we consciously make that choice each day as we wake up. We may not even always realize it, but each and every day we are choosing whether we want to be a follower of Jesus. So what is your choice today?
Today Cakebread Cellars own 75 acres near the winery in the Rutherford AVA, as well as the wonderfully named Dancing Bear Ranch in Howell Mountain. In addition they either control or manage a further 400 acres of vineyard. Roughly half of this is in the cool Carneros AVA – the main source of their Chardonnay – while the rest is split between Sauvignon Blanc and red varieties in Stag’s Leap District AVA, Rutherford and Oakville.
Okay, obviously this is my team. But the 49ers won free agency in the offseason, put together the best draft in the division, and are the favorites by a mile to win this division. If any other team goes .500 I’d be surprised. The 49ers have a shot at another 13-3 season.
USA- President truman:
We want to be free, we want to live, we want peace.
I’ve focused here on books, obviously, but love triangles are in shortage in other media. On TV, it’s often easier to play them out because there’s the benefit of time to develop the relationships in pieces here and there. Of course, if you’re Glee, you just shove them in whenever you possibly can, warranted or not. In games, they can be really interesting, because you again have the benefit of time to develop them, and if the choice is left to the player of who to go after and choose to be with, that adds an awesome aspect of story control and personal involvement in the story for the player. (I’m a big fan of player choice in games when it’s possible to add it.) In movies, it can be harder because you’re short on time, and often if there’s a triangle, it has to be the main thrust of the movie rather than an aspect of it. But hey, what are rom-coms for?
Silent prayers get answered
ISBN-13: 978-0-7564-0666-0
Veda goes on, quoting Monty, who has apparently gone on at great length about women’s legs. Inappropriate! He claims the best legs are found in kitchens, not drawing rooms, and there’s no point taking the mistress if you can get the maid. Wow. Just…wow. Why is he saying these things to this child? What’s wrong with him? And what’s wrong with Mildred that she doesn’t just jettison him? She’s got enough dead weight with Veda.
PS: Upon further research, I discovered that DraftFCB no longer holds the SCJohnson (the makers of Windex) account. Ogilvy & Mather currently holds the Windex account. Perhaps their ads will be less misogynistic. :)
The FUSE IS ALREADY LIT (muthaf*ckas).
Please don't bring your baby or toddler into the workplace. If your niece is pregnant, or your daughter just had a baby, please don't share that with me right now. It's not that I can't be happy for anyone else, it's that every smiling, cooing baby, every glowing new mother makes me ache so deep in my heart I can barely stand it. I may look okay to you, but there's a good chance that I'm still crying every day. It may be weeks before I can go a whole hour without thinking about it. You'll know when I'm ready - I'll be the one to say, "Did your daughter have her baby?" or, "How is that precious little boy of yours? I haven't seen him around the office in a while."
5. People dye their own yarn with varying degrees of success.
I know....I haven't been around much recently. It's not bad news though....it's because things have been going sooo well I've been busier than usual.
Bobby shook his head to clear it. The bucket shook, a thick slopping sound rising to his ears. He started to cry and continued on to the toilet, emptying the bucket. Flushing the ancient bowl, he watched the foulness swirl away to nothing. The bucket he rinsed as best he could, in the sink, while he sobbed. He felt a dark kinship with the bucket, it not being lost on him that they were both battered, dirty vessels, never quite clean.
14:35 SPC protection in Italy
IVPJK Blog (ivpjkblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
When I was eight years old, my lifelong dream was to be a cashier. Alas, I never had the pleasure of fulfilling that dream. However, as a technical writer, I have written several training manuals on how to use sophisticated cash registers. :-)
Well, our little two person Hibachi wasn't good enough for mi esposo.
Well, as they say…no rest for the wicked.
Floss: DMC
That’s the problem with gossip and hearsay. I asked her what mechanic had told her that and she wouldn’t say or couldn’t remember his name. I told her that my husband, a friend and another Volvo mechanic that my husband knew had done a repair on one cylinder and also offered to let her speak to the Volvo mechanic or friend, but of course she didn’t want to do that and refused to tell me who the mechanic she’d spoken to was. A repaired cylinder is not a rebuilt engine.
All congregate in the large kitchen
Oh, praise the Gods of Time and Chance
And that’s who I am”
Bath and Body Works hand sanitizer
HABIB S, RISHPON S, RUBIN L. Influenza vaccination among health care workers. Isr Med Assoc J 2000; 2: 899-901.
He smiled. A gift. Isn’t everyone happy to receive a gift?
At the parts department, I spoke to a shaggy, long haired gentleman of about 40 years of age and requested to pick up the anti-freeze which they had promised to hold for me when I had called earlier that morning. Returning from the back stock room with my item, I could not help but notice that the other gentleman sitting behind the counter at a computer terminal had his eyes locked on me. Like a deer caught in the headlights, he seemed to have scanned me in the same way that the women would always do and most men not....The difference I always find with the men is in that they DON'T give back that same smile that I get from the women. With the women, the smile is like "OK, you're in the club with us and we won't tell anyone about your little secret". With the men, the look is like that which one sees in Science Fiction Sitcoms like "Star Trek" in the 1960's. It's like those scenes where an android humanoid with a computer brain is given some paradoxical situation that it's circuitry cannot resolve. This is usually the point where one then detects smoke coming out of either ear and they proclaim in a rapid secession, "Does not compute.... This does not compute".... and they usually implode or blow up into a million pieces.
Discovering the work of Erika Gerdemark who so lovingly documented this event was part of the fun. She not only photographs weddings but does portraits and fashion as well. Though she's Stokholm based, her work takes her all over Europe. I have to say, perusing the archives of her blog was inspiring. Few photographers can illustrate the pure joy and elegance of a wedding like she can . . . . For some more inspiration you can check out her site
Oh, and I started a relationship, fell in love, and really started focusing on giving that sort of thing the time and attention necessary to work.( for like the first time in a looooong time)
Now, one will definitely be justified in asking why a brutal dictator, who has deliberately ruined his country (80% unemployment, 12 000% inflation, one-third of the population in exile, etc), is treated as a hero by his African peers.
1 yam, cut in pieces
GG: a rock, a rhubarb and a sensations lilac bush.
She understands everything though! I can ask/tell her anything, and she'll do it. My favorite is when she'll take her empty bowl to the kitchen and put it in the sink w/out me asking her. Or watching her run the DVD player. It's just absolutely hilarious to watch a little person doing those thing! She loves matching her shoes up and won't put on a pair unless she has the match to it. She's a shoe princess and she loves getting new clothes! This is very bad for me, LOL.
And returned to me my feeling.
I got it taken care of, it's not perfect but it's not a disaster either.
It's a bloody mouse! And the events take place on a "Myspace-esque website". But Miss Conn was credited under another name when she did this so clearly it doesn't matter as much to her as it does to me. Therefore, she's second to last.
The only thing I would have changed would be to flip the order of the two dessert courses. The stout was so big on the palate that we lost some of the subtleties of the barleywine that came out afterward.
What does Sunkyeol sound like?
I wonder how long this will last?
Frank Couch, Thomas Nelson’s lead editor on the project, told The Christian Post that the purpose of The Voice was to make the Gospel message easier to understand for modern audiences.
The interior is very rustic in a cutesy folk meets french cosmo kinda way. I liked the wall paper so much I'm thinking of using it for my laptop...they should put it on their website...or does noone do desktop-wallpapers anymore?
Well, the idea that came to me the other day really screws with my brain. I probably heard it from someone else and forgot where. It’s exceedingly rare for anyone to come up with a new idea so I think it is ridiculous to believe that I did in this instance. The genesis of this line of thinking is no longer in my data banks, is all I’m saying.
But for someone to actually do that...
Gruyere Scalloped Potatoes by Chez Lisa:
Me did manage to scratch the vet though! They stole my blood and they tried to steal my pee and they sticked me with things in unmentionable Places, and they filled me with water!
But most of all, I feel fulfilled, as I am finally exactly where I want to be, even if it took me half a lifetime to get here.
So, once again, to quote more of those axed X Factor contestants, you haven't seen the last of Michelle Betham, Romance Author....
4. KARDS. (2009) Human Trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation of women and children in East Africa available online here
Her graduate studies have been in this field, she teaches on a college level in this field and also made a comment to me, in so many words that, "I don't mean to sound like I'm arrogant but writing is easy for me- a lot of people don't know how to do it, but it comes easy for me."
Ayu Matsuura as Rin Kaga (Welcome to THE SPACE SHOW)
I'm not allowed to show you the one photo I managed to take between sessions, meals and quaffing. But I can show you a picture of me with my camera, which sort of proves I was there, wherever there was.
28. Boys don’t wake up with bad hair. (** I beg to differ)
Mix the sauteed mushrooms and garlic with the beans and place in a baking dish. Spoon the cream mixture over the beans and gently pat it down into the layers. Spread the almonds over top.
I yearn for the possibility...
In fact, if we had a time-lapse camera sequence long enough, we would see that even mountains, planets and stars are also processes. They rise and fall, are built and consumed, are created and dissipated and the atoms that make them up are constantly changing.
7) "For an extra ten bucks, I'll pump your gas without pants"
On problems with OMMA: The law should be about meeting the needs of patients — that was voters’ intent when they passed it. I’ve heard two things: One, advocates say that people who need it can’t get it. And two, law enforcement says that it’s ending up on the black market. If you care about the law, then you also need to protect its integrity. It should not be used as back-door legalization. It is on this point that Ellen and I differ.
Now I have no excuse for not writing. One by one my excuses for procrastination in developing my writing career are being stripped away and my feet (or fingers as the case may be) are being put to the fire (keyboard).
For our first test we rode Novice B. I didn't feel like it went that great. I squeezed, and SQUEEZED her to try to get a little more energy out of her trot. But I what more could you want at this point? She puts up with a lot. So I didn't mess with her too much.
We need to see He has done it for us and to the degree that our heart is transformed by what He has done for us is what will give us the strength to persevere when the challenges in life try to overtake us.
Writers, both newbie and seasoned, are regularly beaten into a state of jellied insecurity. It makes me sad how easy it is to destroy our confidence. It happens to me two or three times a day.
What keeps running through my head is this: what on earth was I thinking and what the heck do I know about the hell that society puts upon people born with intersexed bodies, or who feel the unavoidable, heartbreaking and brave journey through one gendered existence to another? Between changes at home that made even finding the head-space to read even my university reading lists a challenge, proving to people that you are a serious individual researching transgender/ intersex issues for a literary exploration is even more complex.
The conclusion of the matter is that we should not assume that we have all the truth and that we are mistaken in nothing. Rather we should kneel in adoration before the pierced feet of Him who is the Truth and honor Him by humble obedience to His words." A.W. Tozer
Lady Luck is a really interesting glitter. It has tons of burgundy micro glitters and some slightly larger holographic glitters. The burgundy is really great for my skin tone, and the holographic pieces really kick it up a notch.
She was the designer and the architect
Elisabeth Sladen is best known for her role on Doctor Who as Jon Pertwee’s companion Sarah Jane Smith. Sarah Jane Smith was an investigative journalist and quite a feminist for 1973. She also travelled with Tom Baker’s Doctor for a while as well, but it’s with Sarah Jane Adventures that she really came into her own.
This sweet little downy woodpecker still has some of the suet on his beak.
But have no fear! I already have a handful of agents waiting in the wings to do interviews and judge more rounds of “An Agent’s Inbox,” so when we come back in April, we’ll pick up right where we left off. In the meantime, I’ll do my best to figure out this whole taking-care-of-three-kids thing.
Who knew? I had always wondered about my sour cream buying habits, but never truly faced the facts.
Thank you sooo much for stopping by!! :)
top tier: globe cake- marked with her favorite and most significant countries
The Dervish house was nominated for a number of science fiction awards in 2011. And I can see why. It is a very ambitious novel with many different story lines and characters. The threads of these stories merge at different stages, some right at the very end.
First up is our yummy felt pops.
I was offered copies of these Polaroids, in fact. Now what in the hell would I do with something like that? Send them out as Christmas cards? Which now that I come to think about it I wish I had. They were kind of Christmassy. You know, all red and kind of....red, and stuff.
in your writing notebook. Let it be special. Make it yours.
Lubljana is a small city by world standards – 220,000 people. We drove around a bit, found a place to park and wandered around. Here and there quite quaint, but with the sort of charm that we will mostly look to the small towns to provide.
His works are in many New York museums, including the "Burning of the Merchant's Exchange" which is at the Museum of the City of New York.
● £293,603 from Cecil Humphery-Smith OBE between 2001 and 2007.
As you can see I made my stamping random, and some of stamps are stamped just partly on the edges. Heat emboss it with white embossing powder and let it dry a bit. Just a couple of minutes is enough.
AmCham in Slovakia. The Kats have learned from their friend Zuzana Hecko (Allen & Overy) about an early World IP Day event held last week by the American Chamber of Commerce in Slovakia -- an IP-and-business seminar. Says Zuzana:
This '40s Royal portable was the first one I photographed - clean, beautiful, and tempting, but a bit larger than the portable typewriters I usually favor and the black crinkle paint didn't do much to draw me in. My favorite part is the contrast of the square shift keys with the remaining round keys.
By way of an in-between post I would like to share with you these two great videos from Mali, both in a way related to Super Biton and Ségou.
The Makioka Sisters is the story of four sisters from a once prominent Osaka family who, thanks to the great depression, have now fallen on harder times. Now granted, these harder times, though forcing them to sell the family business, are still times of prominence when compared to the abject poverty that hit Japan in the 1930's and became even worse after the war. We still see a family of ways and means but a family that does not know how to cope with being what they have become. But still, Ichikawa, a director who showed the horrors of this war torn era in The Burmese Harp and Fires on the Plain, never delves into the squalor that the youngest sister subjects herself too in order to be free of the restrictive past. Perhaps in the day and age of 1980's Japan, when the boom of their economy was hitting astronomical levels, Ichikawa was afraid audiences would not take to being reminded of their sometimes ugly past. Instead, the director, even with the inherent sadness, gives us just the beauty of the past.
The shops, design and décor of the airport emphasises wealth. Our lay-over was for three hours. The more I sat around doing nothing in the airport terminal, the more I wanted to explore the area. By the time we boarded at 9.00 am, the outside temperature was already 29 degrees.
A busy day. But a day filled with family, old friends, new friends and lots of love.
Anyway, we were told to either buy or make some for our third cake decorating class. It's pretty expensive to buy so I decided to make some- even though I needed to buy gum tragacanth, a pot of that would last longer and it would be a hassle to have to order Mexican paste online every time I needed it. Which turned out to be quite lucky as the following week at my cake class, we were told we needed twice as much Mexican paste for another project next time!
“I Am a Singer” has focused on artists and performers who are not currently enjoying a great amount of mainstream popularity, so our choices must exclude massively popular acts. The singers or bands may have once been popular in the past and we are being a little flexible with what we consider popular. Since this is indie/underground we're talking about, few singers and bands will fail this test.
Daphanie suffers from Gumtidus Bushalocus, a condition that makes her cringe at the thought of putting anything on her gums. The thought of brushing her teeth makes her violently ill. The thought of flossing can lead to unconsciousness.
If you’re feeling restless, no wonder!
( she probably wouldn't have answered the door in a towel )
After tidying up a little later, Pablo decided to try out my Tidy Tray for size. I think it's a little small for him, but he seemed to like it LOL!!!
7. The last website I visited.
What was that you say you heard? A champagne cork popping? You imaginative soul, you.
The writer then did NOT try to do the same thing for each of the other viewpoints, and that restraint is a VERY.Good.Thing. Instead, simply saying there are three POV's and whose they are tells me what I need to know.
make it hard to see,
What’s funny to me, is that this person obviously thought they were cool enough for someone else to want them. They gave them up for re-sale. Or they just couldn’t bear to see their hard work get tossed.
Antica Farmacista Casablanca Lily
And you're miles away
still the one from my dream.
If you question the value of your presence to those around you, consider that lilac-laden trellis. Just a few snips would dislodge branches and upset the amazing network that allows its top-heavy lilac growth to stand. God created each one of us with the means to nourish and to support one another as only we can. So it is that we follow Jesus’ lead and do just that. Everyone connected to us depends on it!
While many would say that GMA Films is not a home of the blockbusters and winning movies, I guess The Road is one movie you should exempt. I watched the movie when it was released locally. Basically, you’ll expect a new kind cinematography aside from what Filipinos are used to seeing. It will make you feel like you are in the scene and not just watching it from a movie house. The camera rotations, color tones, lens flares, wiggly shots, all of these will put you in the world where you cannot escape terror. You will feel like you are running for your life, and you just want to help the cast. The sounds are thrilling and it crawls on your skin.
And change the way you look at this big world
It's about: Stephanie Nielson (NieNie) is a famous Mommy-blogger whose life changed dramatically when she and her husband were in a serious near-fatal plane crash which left 80% of her body burned. The memoir chronicles her life before the crash and her struggles to deal with the aftermath of it
Paul Young Come back and stay UK
I will continue this post later in the week using other examples of weight loss, exercise, and careers.
Brouwerij Het Anker Gouden Carolus Classic
Young Life and Adpi. My heart, my best friends ever!
Again, thanks for an inspiring post:o)
And for Pincus I have two words. Ge.Nius.
The lights were dimmed and Hello Kitty flashlights illuminated the dancers. The jewelry box music played again and again as the dancers twirled spontaneously.
After narrating the development of fascist parties throughout Europe, the author devotes a short (8 out of 258 pages) chapter to analyzing the similarities that allowed for fascism to emerge in interwar Europe. In describing these similarities, Carsten emphasizes that politically these parties all advocated strong nationalism, violent anti-communism, a hatred of democracy, and a powerful myth of the nation. These movements were devoted to a cult of violence as many of the early members were veterans for whom fighting was a way of life. Fascist groups appealed to the young especially because they were bored with the postwar governments and attracted to regimes which promised radical change. Not only were the fascist movements attractive to the youth but appealing to all social groups (except those who groups ostracized by the fascists like the Jews). But, while appealing to all groups, Carsten continually stresses the importance of the middle and lower middle classes, defined as artisans, tradesmen, small farmers, low level government employees, former officers and NCOs, and white collar workers, in supporting the fascist movements because these groups were displaced from their traditional places in society and frightened by the future. Carsten concludes that fascism emerged due to “a malaise, a maladjustment of capitalist society, the victims of which were the lower middle classes.” (233)
Among other things, the report revealed a 60 percent drop in Interest on Lawyers’ Trust Accounts (IOLTA), which is an important source of funding for legal aid; a 20 percent drop in local government funding support for legal services; and a decrease of more than $1 million in charitable donations and volunteer services. As a result, 21 lawyers working for legal aid organizations along with 30 non lawyers had to be laid off. At the same time these cuts were being made, the demand for legal assistance increased by 20 percent.
A teaser site for the game launched last week with a couple of grainy images and a lot of secrecy but it looks as if Activision’s big reveal has been revealed by a number of pre-order cards that have cropped up in the US.
well, if THAT news doesn't make you want to shout from the rooftops, maybe a few items
310) an apology for in-sensitiveness
16. Ceases all aggressive, U.S. government military actions worldwide
Group shot of the 'Superstition" iris shows how robust this iris is. It has large fans of leaves and many stalks of flowers.
Preheat oven to 350°F/180°C. Butter a round 10-inch pan or equivalent, or 6 individual dishes.
It is commonly accepted wisdom by now that French director Jean Renoir was by nature a humanist; Boudu Saved From Drowning—which I saw for the first time, in a less-than-stellar but serviceable print, during Brooklyn Academy of Music's extensive Renoir retrospective—complicates that popular critical wisdom just a bit, so slashing is its attack on societal class divisions. Here, Mr. Lestingois (Charles Granval)—a bookseller who is cheating on his wife (Marcelle Hainia) with the maid (Sévérine Lerczinska)—rescues the extraordinarily rude and unkempt Boudu (Michel Simon) after Boudu attempts to drown himself (in a fit of despair after losing his dog), and he wins acclaim as a good Samaritan for his act of charity. Turns out, though, that Boudu isn't particularly thrilled about being rescued, and he—not intentionally, perhaps, but as a result of his own nature—proceeds to wreak havoc on the already tenuous harmony of his well-meaning host family in anarchic and hilariously wrong ways. Though Renoir doesn't stoop to painting the members of the Lestingois household in broad, stick-figure strokes—that kind of deck-stacking wasn't Renoir's way—it's Michel Simon's uproarious gruffness and the character's utter refusal to conform to middle-class standards of decency that gives the film its potent subversive charge.
Miss Hooters smiled at her friend Dream,
We enjoyed the unfailingly kind reception we received from the scientists. Saudis really do love children and always interact with my kids. They treated me with dignity and politeness. There weren't many women at the exhibit, but a lot of kids.
What I do not doubt is that the culture of ANZAC Day must change. War must be portrayed more realistically. A public debate on what justifies going to war and when it is appropriate to end war must be encouraged. This includes a public debate on holding our political and military leaders accountable for their decisions, but for this to happen more information about why and how we wage war needs to be accessible and comprehensible. The public’s ability to assess official reasons for why we went to war, how we wage war and why we continue to do so has been (and remains) largely impotent where governments insist on secrecy. This ignores valuable historical lessons and puts Australian lives at risk.
Norvell Page is best known these days as man who wrote most of the classic pulp adventures of The Spider. His Spider prose has a fervor that grabs you by the throat and won't let go until the final page.
The 42-page coroner’s report
But no job = no money = no scrapbooking!
Mendelsohn, 21, is a medical assistant by day and a candy artist by night. M&M’s are her medium for artistic expression and the patterns she creates are mind-boggling and stunning. She begins by separating the M&Ms by color into gallon size freezer bags and then she sits down to create a pattern.
There He’ll reward us
Equal rights for all? That's not what Holder said in testimony before the Senate Judiciary Committee this spring. He asserted that the hate bill does not protect Christian ministers, whites, heterosexuals, policemen and members of U.S. military. Only favored groups, he said, such as homosexuals, blacks, Latinos, Jews, Muslims, and women will benefit under this new law.
- Media24 Investigations
- Connemara Turf Mor Peated Single Malt
‘Bingo Little, blast him. He’s always singing nowadays. That’s what I’m writing my strong letter to the Committee about – the intolerable nuisance of this incessant heartiness of his. Because it isn’t only his singing. He slaps backs. Only yesterday he came sneaking up behind me in the bar and sloshed me between the shoulder blades, saying “Aha!” as he did so. Might have choked me. How many “s’s ” in “incessant”?’
So what do I do? I want to be a teacher but I have no experience or time to take classes. I could take classes online and learn by-the-book, but I’m a hands–on kind of girl! Even if I get credentialed and get a job in this economy, I’d make less money than I do now. And what If I don’t like teaching as much as I think I will? At least I’ll be able to move around and talk above a whisper…
Bulsara shrugged. “I guess we’ll have to find the Lady.”
kiṁ karma kim akarmeti
I guess I'm just trying to find my sea legs.
Moon Dreamers
Isotonix Digestive Enzyme Formula with Probiotics is an isotonic-capable food supplement that is made from a combination of DigeZyme®, a blend of amylase, protease, cellulase, lactase, and lipase, and Lactospore®, the probiotic Lactobacillus sporogenes, and potassium, magnesium, maltase and sucrase, designed to replenish essential digestive enzymes and probiotics, contributing to good digestive health. Isotonix Digestive Enzyme Formula helps maintain healthy cholesterol levels, promotes digestion and absorption of nutrients, supports a healthy digestive tract, supports a healthy immune system and may help ease occasional stomach upset. DigeZyme is a multi-enzyme complex consisting mainly of amylase (starch hydrolyzing enzyme), protease (protein hydrolyzing enzyme) and lipase (fat hydrolyzing enzymes). In addition to these, it also contains cellulase (that hydrolyzes cellulose) and lactase (that hydrolyzes lactose). The enzymes in this complex are of microbial origin (fungal amylase, lipase, lactase, cellulase; and a bacterial neutral protease). The product is, therefore, entirely of non-animal origin. Lactospore, a preparation containing viable spores of L. sporogenes, has been used in successful clinical trials in the management of gastrointestinal issues, mild lactose intolerance and supporting healthy immune functions.
We will continue our streak of crusty white breads with Kaiser Rolls. Stay tuned!
(*I wish. A girl can dream. In real life, and not in that crazy fantasy life where I end up with the thriller, I did my trilling “No, no, no!! I insist,” bit, all the while desperately hissing to self, Do Not Say, “you have it, while you can; you may be dead next week,” and it was he who tucked it under his arm and strolled off, whistling flatly through ill-fitting teeth leaving me with sub-standard fare like Rosamund Pilcher to pick over.)
CALL FOR ARTISTS:* You must be able to guarantee a min. of 5 guests.* 3 song acoustic set* No gigs 2 weeks before or after* Original music only* You must be a Songsalive! Elite member www.songsalive.org - go to "join"* Member benefits at www.songsalive.org* FOLLOW THE INSTRUCTIONS TO PERFORM: Showcase application at www.songsalive.net
*PAIR uses pseudonyms to protect the identity of our students.
The police were panicked, of course, almost hysterical. They’d never expected anything like this, began firing, probably shot each other, shot people in the crowd, and in the end, seven police died and at least three of the demonstrators. Many, many people were wounded, and later seven anarchists were fingered for trial, although no conclusive evidence was brought to bear. May Day became a global labor holiday in honor of the “Haymarket Martyrs” who were tried by a judge so prejudiced against them that their execution has often been referred to as “judicial murder.” More importantly, May 1 became a traditional day across the world to honor workers rights.
Anyway, the moral of this blog is there are certain sacrifices that must be made for these kinds of trips; unfortunately, many of them are beauty-related.
We are still going through all the applications and hope to start contacting applicants this weekend. I will definitely post here on the blog when we've done that so that you don't have to wonder. We will not only be picking DT members, but also guest designers. And remember... another call will go out around July'ish.
The plan also encourages strength training. Twice a week, I complete a Nautilus circuit at the gym. Once a week, I complete the strength training exercises outlined in the book (in lieu of the Nautilus). I began strength training last June, after completing my first marathon.
We was white boys, red-blooded Americans to this day and at home and when we went somewhere we was noticed; once was we sure and once was we smooth and once was we in the driver’s seat, and once we drove around with our arm out the window; we turned heads and the women looked our way; we had a swagger to our step that said who we was; dared each other to knock our hats off as we stood up for ourselves before; was to take a girl for a soda, was to take a girl to the picture show, was to smooch and go almost all the way; from the boondocks to the drive-in we was smooth operators; big shots, into cars and girls amid those who didn’t have cars and girls, casting moonbeams brilliant upon their dreamy eyelids; threatening rain and thunder on the day of our parade, when the homecoming queen sat on her float and the DJ played “Moon River” and we slow-danced the night away, by the light of the moon and searched the dance floor for a lady; dirty dancin’, risky business, burnin’ rubber, speedin’, talkin’, smokin’, kissin’; crusin’, cussin’, acting smart, etcetera, etcetera, lovin’, and the way you turn me on, I can’t think, and those were the days and we was their heroes, sweet!
Nothing in life is free, and there is never something for nothing - except perhaps in the Bible.
The words of another well-known American conservative, Patrick Buchanan. Mahoney and Wallace were of course Southern Democrats. And Nixon subsequently swept the polls for the Republicans with a 49 State landslide. His conservative policies were popular even if his subsequent Machiavellianism was not.
Blend all the ingredients together, drizzling in olive oil until a paste consistency is reached. Pour into a clean jar and cover the top with olive oil. Will keep in the fridge for at least a month.
When I finally managed to get downstairs (after lots of cups of tea, and several phone well wishers) I was met with another lovely surprise.
"I am well enough, Mr. Murray! I just need to sit down and drink my cordial to feel tip-top again. As for you, miss, you should not be out here. What would your father say?"
mid December I got mild shingles
so for the last 1k leg, mom challenged me to run to the finish line, and boy did i do it. i did it just after i inhaled a granola bar too. they don’t call me “iron stomach” for nothing. we did it and dad was there to cheer us as we crossed the finish line! mom and dad were so proud of us!!
From up here in the aircraft we can see the river's flow!
Thank you for all of your lovely comments which have been coming thick and fast to this blog – and via social media – we’ve been really overwhelmed by the level of interest. Comments included ‘First chick, whoop, whoop’, ‘I feel honoured to be able to watch these beautiful creatures’, ‘Wow, this is amazing’, ‘Amazing picture quality’ and ‘Am glued to my laptop here in Corfu’. Viewers were also sharing records of exactly what they were seeing and when, and some even took the time to send us some quality images of their own which they had taken directly from their computers.
guided by the Light dimmed by many
unfortunately, it was while we were in the colloseum (did you know you could actually walk around IN the colloseum?!?).
7. Money (6:29)
You seem to move on easy
computers, computer accessories
Mozzarella sticks hold a dear place in my heart. They've been a favorite of mine ever since I remember. I allow myself to indulge in them as a treat every time I'm at a Sonic (which isn't often enough, because, sadly, the closest one is an hour's drive).
Just for kicks and giggles, here are a few more interesting video clips similar to the Social Media Revolution.
shining brightly from afar
Cared less about what other people think. It's no way to live your life, let alone be a writer. A writer needs to tell the story that niggles and nags to be written, even if no one else gets it. Or likes it. Or buys it.
thank you thank you thank you for all of your support throughout this journey. you guys have been incredible and you keep me sane.
And Jesus crouched against a wall and cried for Calvary.
Ephesians 2, Isaiah 28, Isaiah 58, Matthew 21, 1 Peter 2, 2 Chronicles 7, Psalm 133
O God! can I not save
Healthy splash of oil (olive or vegetable)
Adriana Braga, Pontifícia Universidade Católica do Rio de Janeiro. Microcelebrity, the Medium, and the Message
Jules and I read this book today and attempted to balance apples on our heads, which is a very hard thing to do. If you have never tried it, I suggest you do, so that you can appreciate the difficulty of what you're about to see.
I see that Anush likes to eat chocolate flavored with mint...I never tired and thought I would never like it. But few days back on of my friends had these thin chocolate mint wafer cookies, so I thought why not try it and see how it tastes. You will not believe, it tasted so good and the mint flavor just chills your throat and that feels awesome.
Thanks so much for hopping by!
Live long and prosper, may the force be with you and the odds be ever in your favor, stay shiny, and don’t forget to be awesome!
The album "Sleepdrunk Seasons" will be released in France in January, but was released in January 2008 in Iceland and can already be downloaded internationally.
"We've had a house in Sanderson for about 12 years, and now we have one in Alpine. I didn't say anything about these plans for a long time. It was just a pipe dream, but then this finally panned out. There's no stopping it now."
*Roll out in a rectangle about 18" x 22" (1/4 " thick)
Casino
Fenugreek seeds
“It is something like a madman’s private language, isn’t it? So intricate in its convolutions. Say you have a rope lying on the deck; after the third hour of the afternoon on Idler’s Day it’s a half-stroke babblegibbet, and then at midnight on Throne’s Day it becomes a rope again, unless it’s raining.”
RYAN’S REVIEW
I'm still hacking up loogeys and snorting in the early mornings and late afternoons and quite frankly, I've had enough. I. Dont. Get. Sick. And this mantra has worked well for me most of my life, as I truly don't ...except for the rare occasions that I do and then it's never pretty.
Time: 6pm for a 6:30pm start
Hectic schedules, high levels of stress, a growing dependence on nutrient-deficient processed and fast foods, artificial food additives and preservatives, sedentary lifestyles, alcohol consumption, smoking, recreational and prescription drug use, thousands of toxic chemicals in every day household and industrial products, environmental pollution, soil depletion - these are some of the common contributing factors to a general decline in people's health, producing conditions ranging from a vague feeling of malaise to more serious chronic and degenerative disease states. Ultimately, the body is burdened by toxic overload as it is not designed to cope with these hazards in the excessive quantity and frequency to which it has become exposed.
573-447-5179
And now, if you’ll excuse me, I’ll go in search of my copy of one of my most favorite all-time movies: Chocolat! (I’m wondering if there’s a conching machine or grinder anywhere in the background that I didn’t notice before … and even if there isn’t, I just love Johnny Depp in this, don’t you?!)
On another note, expect to see rings with many of my posts from now on. Initially I wanted to make a post showing them all, but as I'm always making new ones I decided it'd be much more fun to spice up my plain-looking-manicure pictures.
The Savernake formation itself shows a classic star tetrahedron of interlocking triangles reminiscent of the Merkabah, or ‘Chariot of the Gods’, the vehicle used by Ascended Masters and those advanced in the discipline of meditation and self-mastery to ascend to the next vibrational level of consciousness. The Merkabah is itself a symbol of the Ascension process, which humankind is presently beginning to experience. This ‘chariot’ or device used by the gods is a metaphor for one’s ability to activate within the human mind and energy body a synthesis of mind-body-spirit which transports the soul to higher vibrational states and ‘another’ dimension. It is inkeeping with crop circle design – particularly those of 2010 – that this formation has multiple interpretations: it can also be seen as a solstitial coronal mass ejection (CME) which that day (June 23rd) was already two days into its journey towards earth, having left the solar magnetosphere on solstice, and which hit the telephone and electrical systems of Earth’s northern hemisphere on the same day as the lunar eclipse, June 26th.
For example, did you know?
Happy Easter everyone!
Not all cheap food locations are in 'exotic, off the beaten track' locations in an open air environment made complete by their very own set of pet cats.
For anyone wishing to follow events in Mauritania the first difficulty is in identifying sources. This fairly comprehensive list of websites and FaceBook groups created by a student from the University of Leicester may be of help. As always, the problem with directory lists is in keeping them updated, and new sites and groups are appearing every week. The second difficulty is the language barrier for those who do not read Arabic or French, as English or Spanish language sources are few and far between. I try to maintain a steady flow of news on this blog, which you are welcome to follow and comment on.
There we sat in a crowd of 28,000 people cheering for the home team Bucs! It seemed like the weight an entire city was riding on every pitch. It was so intense that I didn’t even mind the three year old sitting behind me who literally kicked the back of my chair for nine innings. There was the perogi race, the weiner toss, the t-shirt toss, and the perfect coordination of the ground’s crew who came out every three innings to drag the infield. There was the standing and singing of God Bless America in the seventh inning and the follow-up during the stretch of Take Me Out to the Ball Game. Have you ever heard 28,000 people singing Take Me out to the Ball Game? It is quite truthfully a sound to behold. There were the fireworks and the roar of 28,000 people in the seventh inning when Pirates rookie Pedro Alvarez walloped a homerun kicking off a rally that eventually gave the Bucs the win.
Okay, this is the point where most Islamicists, myself included, get slightly chagrin, as most introductory texts on Islamic history rely more of works by non-Muslim authors than on those by Muslim ones. The source material is Muslim, of course, but in terms of secondary literature, particularly if you want material in English, the list of Muslim authors will generally be fairly short.
The one caked in mud and don't even ask the rest is over on the grass. Still getting bits of duckweed and feathers out of me hair after my untimely encounter with the duck pond.
- Work as advertised: lift our stains (even stains that have been sitting for a week!) and brighten our clothes
Black Flowers by Steve Mosby
The designer paper is from Oct Afternoon. The lace
"But then Mrs. T got you and took you outside and you feel fine?"
The first thing to do is to expose and eliminate this absurd ethnomasochism. Europeans are not guilty of anything; the blame for the underdevelopment of the Third World lies with their own leaders and their own populations. Of course, we are willing to help, but always in their places of origin. And we’ll not allow them to invade our lands, collapse our economies and destroy our ancient cultures.
"Inger was her name. And Isak was his name."
Tony Stark summarizes this perfectly to Loki in a TV spot for The Avengers movie, “We have two world class assassins, a super-soldier, and a demigod. And you managed to *&%$ off every last one of us.”
I'm not making that up, we really do have marbles with his face plastered all over it with that wacky spelling to try and make them look good to kids. The joke's on the company though - the second a kid swallows one of Ben 10's marBawz they'll get sued back to a time where cartoons were about animals trying to make it to a magical animal reserve where they can live happily ever after.
Another refreshing feature is constant innovation through the pilot brewery. The pilot system that we would be brewing on is a 10 BBL, 5 vessel brewhouse produced by Mueller. This system has been in use for 7 years. The next part of camp was to determine the recipe we would make. Our camp had been tossing ideas around via email and we all liked hops. We decided to aim for about 9.3% ABV and 100+ IBUs. The grain bill included Pale Malt, Golden Promise, Munich, Light Crystal and a small bit of Special B. The hops included an experimental “Super Chinook,” Citra, Centennial, and wet Estate Chinooks in the hopback. It will be dry-hopped with Citra and then torpedoed in the Brite with Simcoe and Amarillo.
A kidney stone. A tiny deposit sat at the exit of one of my tubes trying to get out.
Lastly, I thought that “The Painted Glasstower” by Betty Tureaud[SLURL] was both a beautiful and an impressive installation. The glass panels change over time and I think there is also an elevator box driving through the middle of the tower to the top (I entered the hole from the top and then landed on top of said box and drove a bit back up with it).
The collection has not reached the stores yet, it's so new that it hasn't even been published on the Maja Design site! So to give you a hint of
This is part of a little series where I aim to try one new thing at least once a month- no matter how big or small! If you want to read the rest of the posts so far, click here.
You had that effect on Nancy and Melissa,
The bcurious is a pretty straightforward vibe, with 7 pretty average speed settings – fast, faster, fastest, some other variation of speed ... except for the magical no 4 – the thuck thuck thuck brrrrrr is quite spectacular. The vibrations are strong enough to work well through clothes but quiet enough to not be heard through doors and walls. The fact that it’s waterproof will make bathtime playtime, if water sports is what you’re into. Just make sure the silicone plug is properly plugged and don’t use any bath oils as this could deteriorate the silicone.
Unavailable to Comment
Use apple cider vinegar or any vinegar of choice (except for maybe balsamic and red wine vinegar).
I used the new à la mode set, Lightbulb Moment for my card. The à la modes are such fun sets and this one is no exception! The Die-namics I used on my card are the new Rectangle STAX set 1, Mini Scallop Edge, and my favorite flower of the moment, Botanical Beauty. All of the papers are from the MME On the Bright Side ONE 6x6 pad.
JJ: “Man, this kid ain’t ever seen Diff’rent Strokes! I said to him one day, ‘What’chu talkin’ ’bout Willis?’ and he said ‘Whaaaaat?!’”
Here is another one of my completed projects:
Lauren ran from door to door with big Kaelin. Little Kaelin, stayed in her stroller with me. The girls had so much fun. Lauren would say "Trick or Treating" hehehe when asking for candy. It was too cute. When I'd say "Say, thank you, Lauren" she'd said "Thank you, Lauren" HA! Gotta love 2 year olds.
P.O. Box 783861
The Only Minority
And quietly thank all the other artists, from me…….
- Registration and proof of insurance
I thought this was much more of an IPA than a barleywine, maybe it was because it is such a young beer. Loved the marriage of bitter hops and sweet fruits. I think this beer could be even better after some aging. Not overly heavy on the alcohol even though is in 9.5%, it is very well hidden and I could easily session this beer, even though it would get me in trouble!
* Excellent writing skills
The perfect gift for the itinerant thinker"
They look hideous from the start and will be unwanted slums in ten years.
Despite the attentions of most of the popular girls in school, including the icily beautiful Shelley Aryanski, my heart would be set on Naomi, the awkward art student whom I knew would be a stone-cold fox if only she'd take off those thick-rimmed glasses of hers. I'd capture her fragile heart by playing Damien Rice songs on a ukulele and pretending I'd written them. With the new strength she found in me she'd overcome her bulimia and her sculpture would really flourish.
Omer Arbel - seven keys, executed perfectly on a piano, still don’t make an octave. The last key is critical!
I’m sure all of you reading this can recall the cries of Democrats during the 2004 presidential campaign, encapsulated by failed presidential candidate & self proclaimed war hero John F’in Kerry as he stated in a February 14, 2004 debate, “He’s cut the VA (Veterans Administration) budget and not kept faith with veterans across this country. And one of the first definitions of patriotism is keeping faith with those who wore the uniform of our country.”
08-Eliminators - Doho
It's November. Which translates as cold in Chicago, which means the imminent arrival of snow, wind and misery. So how do I cope? At the beach, of course. I traveled to Nassau over the weekend and spent hours at the beach soaking up the sun and sea as fortification for six months of freezing temperatures. Orange Hill Beach is a small public beach on the north end of Nassau. Lined with coral and mounds of seaweed, I found the beach charming and mostly untouched. I only shared the beach with seagulls and the odd beach walkers.
Yet, something had changed inside of me as I was sure it had changed for thousands, maybe millions of others who were not physically affected (at least not yet) by the attacks.
WHERE? Right here on WordPress. I will host the series, gather the entries, select a panel of judges, post the finalists, post polls for reader voting, and award prizes.
Sunset at ‘Sunset Point’, Kanyakumari, which is the sangam of the Bay of Bengal, Arabian Sea and the Indian Ocean. A rare piece of land from where you can catch the sunrise & sunset over the same water, just a few km apart. Which is about all you can do at Kanyakumari!
Not only do we have a brand new blog, but we also have a new design team. You can meet all these lovely ladies over on our Design Team page.
For the topping you will need:
Line: Express Finish
And, the thing is, it is a near certainty that that information would have gotten out. There would have been sufficient disgust in both the CIA and in the Pentagon that somebody would have made sure that the news got out that Barack Obama – who had PROMISED THE AMERICAN PEOPLE that he would go into Pakistan to get bin Laden - had cowardly refused to keep yet another promise.
Cook the beet for about 25-30 minutes for firm. Cool for 20 minutes. Cut into julienne strips.
And that is enough.
Thank you so much for all of your support over the past year. It really has helped me to keep going. I hope you've enjoyed it at least as much as me (if not more, after all, you didn't actually have to do anything! hmph!) and look forward to reminiscing with you about it all in years to come.
The prize this week is
Her subtlety comes across again, in the ‘The Word for It’ where in the heat of rising desire the climax cleaves away from expression:
Begin reviewing for midterms. The midterm outline is posted below.
Imperial Sugar is selling out to an international conglomerate the year after the Texas Legislature chose to close the Central Unit (formerly the Imperial unit) which was an early center of convict leasing that made Imperial a lucrative enterprise a century ago, with labor costs not much higher than a slave owner's. Grits finds it ironic that both institutions should dissolve so close to one another, as though their fates were somehow entwined.
The frittata made a great on the road meal and I was quite pleased with my made up combination of spinach and leeks, inspired by the giant leeks found at the store.
Several weeks ago a family friend contacted me. Their son, whom I've known since he was in kindergarten, is graduating from high school this year. They wanted to give him a surprise on the night of his senior prom. He loves my car. The surprise would be for me to pick him up and drive he and his date to prom. I was thrilled and honored and accepted the invite. The irony that I was doing this on the 20 year anniversary of my own senior year was not lost on me. Twenty years now, where'd they go? Below is a picture of me with my friend and his date. Below that you can watch Seger reminisce.
In the land of never ending,
Phusion Projects said in a statement posted on its website that the company will remove caffeine and two other ingredients from its products going forward.So, it's just going to be Loko? Since there will be no more Four.
3. The succesful conception of the embryo is then harvested – usually at the end of the first trimester.
With Contributions from NYTimes, Today Entertainment, and FoxNews
Yoo Eun Jae is a bodyguard with ajumma hair. And her company appears to have just one employee. She’s a tomboy with no sense of fashion or the application of common etiquette and is your typical kdrama female lead who eventually falls for the bad boy. She’s a huge fan of Red Dreamers‘ rival team Blue Seagulls.
Bottom-line is that after he got fired he started his own business and became such a success that he bought the company he was fired from and a few years later he was on the Forbes Top 100 list as one of the richest people in the World. Quite a positive ending and had he not had such bad experiences at work and had he not been fired, he would probably never have founded his own company and become so financially successful.
The Studio 8 team is privileged to be working on plans to revitalize another Stoke-on-Trent Pottery, at Middleport in Burslem, and we are always amazed by the confidence and dexterity displayed by the skilled workers when handling the clay. The below picture is of Middleport’s Mould Maker, John Machin, who has worked in the factory since 1977.
How can we change it if we don’t know about it? How can we make it better if we look away?
Jones responded by saying, “Sir, you don’t get saved by getting on your feet – you get saved by getting on your face.”
We did not think she was going to get in this time. She found out in December that she was put on the waiting list. The deadline for reapplying was just two weeks after receiving that notice and the prompt for the required essay was to explain what you had done since finding out that you did not get into the School of Nursing to improve and make yourself a better candidate. What exactly can one do in the two week time period? We all got a good laugh out of that. She was so tempted to say, "I have done NOTHING, but I am not going away so you might as well let me in now instead of later." Anyhow, I don't remember exactly what she came up with for that two page essay, but we all kept throwing ideas at her. It was a group effort.
Me: (In English) Nothing.
- Dorie says that the cake is better the second day. So of course I had to test that! We sampled some for dessert the evening I baked the cake, then had more for breakfast (it has fruit, don't forget), and then again that evening. The cake was well-tested, to be sure.
The documentary is now available for download via torrent.
The gin bottle also includes two recipes for cocktails, but these are given in Lithuanian; I have translated them for you below.
I know my mother is concerned about my future but I really wish she would just stop and accept my life as it is.
I've always believed that to attain BLISS one must have some kind of spiritual connection. For me, it's with a God who loves me although my faith weaves in and out of methods of expression. Still, I know who I am and what I believe. I think that puts me light years ahead of most other people.
First the positive news is that I went out for dinner on Wednesday night with a friend from University. We met at 7.30 and couldn’t stop talking. In fact the waitress came to take our order 3 times because we just couldn’t seem to pull ourselves away from chat! It was a lovely evening and I felt really comfortable there as me. (He does read this blog so thanks for a nice evening)
Maybe that’s the answer, since our own Congress will do nothing!
I confess that I convince myself to buy junk food at the store to use as treats for my daughter, only to hide them and then eat them myself once the kids are in bed. Along the same lines, I confess that giving my son vanilla wafers to "play" with during mealtimes should be a crime, since they always end up getting smashed and broken. Each time I vacuum up pieces of vanilla wafer, a small part of me dies inside.
The cold wind blows, yet the sun shines on,
Escalante also got a slight twist in the tale story. I was not sure what was going on with the Mexican guy dropping off his kid and why the doctor was babysitting him, but it was interesting that Escalante began to recognise his younger self and give him a chance. When he took the lad home and realised he was pretty much from the same place and beginnings, he realised he ought to (at least on the surface) give the lad a chance. It probably made it easier when he found out the doc was pregnant, at the end of the episode. Two episodes to go. Very good show.
As long as you have life, you will have stages.
I proceeded to watch the rest of the episode. By myself. In my bed. Wearing my emergency 3D glasses.
Don’t get me wrong, I still don’t hate them (in fact I said I loved them earlier in the post) but I just hate that one part of the whole playsuit/romper/jumpsuit experience. I wish there was a solution to this issue but right now I cannot think of any other than having a zipper through the middle and not to wear them at all are my only solutions.
What is significant to me is who stepped up to the plate and brought an end to the siege.
Well, I am determined that we WILL go!
Earlier this month I was lucky enough to meet up with Martin in London for an exclusive chat. An enormously engaging interviewee, he was happy to talk about every aspect of his career, and I found him incredibly honest and candid. It turned into quite a lengthy chat, so below is the first part of this two part interview.
2. How To Do Your Other Make-up - The general rule of thumb when wearing red lipstick is to keep all your other make up quite simple as the red lips will already draw attention to your face. The classiest way to acheive this look is to apply a slick of black eyeliner near the lash line and apply two coats of mascara (or falsies) and ta da Hollywood glamour!
Worth catching: racial tensions, knife fights, and more irrational squid paranoia that leads nowhere but a higher decibel level.
1 carrot, cut into small cubes
Fill a shaker halfway with ice. Place Tequila, Triple Sec, blue Curacao, and
I had seen a photo of a kitchen that I loved in the Cottage Living Fresh Ideas magazine last year, these stools were my favorite (photo above), I wanted them so badly! I found this super old stool at a garage sale this summer and paid $15 for it, it has been around forever, the people I bought it from said it was in their old house that they bought from some very old people, how is that for specific??? Anywhooo... I begged my neighbor to make me a slipcover for it, she told me it would take her a while, she is a busy grandmother, I gave her a copy of this photo and the material that I wanted her to use back in May, yesterday during a snow storm she brought it over to me, I am so excited!!! I had kind of forgotten about it, Doesn't she look purty in her new dress??!!!
Where Labour authorities decide to go down the, still as yet unmapped, path of the "Co-operative Council", UNISON needs to adopt an approach of critical engagement which both protects (and asserts) our independent role as representatives of the interests of workers and seeks to push local authorities away from the rocks and rapids of outsourcing towards more fruitful and practical "work streams" of co-production and community engagement.
But as individuals, don’t we all have a role in making sure that our fellow motorist and pedestrian is also safe? Yes all of us have calls to take, all- important meetings to attend but we use that hurry to reach somewhere on time as an excuse to forget any and every rational, safe and logical behavior. Like I always tell Guru, it is okay to be known as a latecomer to a destination rather than being “Late Mr./Ms. X.” i hear what you are thinking – what is the point if i am the only one following the rules, practicing safe driving behavior…I look like a fool and I get jeered at anyways? But realize this, if there are 10 of us today, it will become 50 tomorrow,100 next week and soon all of us will be extending this common courtesy to our fellow citizens…..Every small bit helps and like the Tamil saying, சிறு துளி பெறு வெள்ளம் (little drops make a mighty ocean)
Welcome to the April 2012 Issue of Fancy Pants Designs' newsletter!
(4)“I did read the book and he didn’t…” actually he did, see page…
are unavoidable, but already being compared to such established acts is a big achievement for these young Icelanders. Last autumn they supported in 15 concerts across Europe fellow countrymen Sigur Rós. It's a Trap! went out for a drink with them and discovered that apart from good musicians they are very friendly and down to earth chaps.
UPDATE 10:45 AM - Received this press release from Hudson Related:
What part does Linton play in the present?
This award was designed to direct traffic to less well-known blogs (less than 200 followers) and is designed to be passed around.
18) Favorite song and/or dance sequence from a musical
Makes approximately 15 muffins.
I traded the winding path for a stone staircase and tossed the gazebo. The island rocks are still just basic geometry, and will require a bit of carving to look all craggy and weathered. Also, still need to spooky up the house and add some twisted gnarled trees.
Wayne County & The Back Street Boys: Max's Kansas City 1976
A: I attended the Indiana Library Federation Annual Conference during the first part of this week. Unfortunately, I didn't have a chance to prep posts before leaving, so that's why I've been MIA on the blog this week. Sorry for the lack of content!
After trying a few different methods I thought I'd share what worked best for me.
Lovely. Hopefully he isn’t toxic. With how thin the walls are he could get me in my sleep.
from their Nesquik -- but they continue to use synthetic dyes and flavorings
The supermarket has complained to suppliers using the Union flag on their packaging – amid fears it might offend customers in Scotland and Northern Ireland. The chain said the decision to add the flag to products had been made by manufacturers without consulting the supermarket.
I also made his card and mostly everything followed the blue, black, white, and kraft paper scheme :)
We learned in the special exhibit that Hugo was not the happiest and most cheerful of men; one might call his world view dark and depressing. When we went upstairs to his apartments, the question presented itself: does a black view of the world cause one to cover their walls and ceiling in matching wallpaper, and the floor with an equally busy carpet? Or does such a style of decorating lead to the depression?
1993, 9 years old: I got hit in the face with a bowling ball at a birthday party and my front tooth )(thankfully it was a baby tooth) turned black and fell out.
The American colonies had no standing armies and relied upon militias. This was an inheritance from England, where all adult males in emergency situations had been liable to provide military service. The militias varied wildly in quality depending upon the training and resources dedicated to them, and this meant that the militias were normally not a resource to be depended upon to fight a long war against a formidable enemy. (All states still have laws on the books regarding militias and usually all adult males are part of the militia. During World War II several states activated militia regiments to take the place of the National Guard units sent overseas.)
Mary E. Braddon – Good Lady Ducayne
These websites are going to be useful as a outcome of they are not simply free but in addition there can be more people becoming a member of which suggests there will likely be extra individuals to fulfill up with and begin a friendship with. There are quite so much of free online relationship sites which supply an entire bundle for nothing however they’ve a complete bunch of 1000′s of members every year becoming a member of perhaps much more and it means they’ll make their cash and supply free membership.
Though we are merely something to put up
Ok, now time for bed. How do I work this think again? Damn. Didn’t know I needed my pilots license in order to work the bed. Oh, yeah, I have to actually get up. Well, not everything is done for you in “Virgin Atlantic Upperclass”. So, I hit the button. That is so cool. For some reason, the movie Transformers pops in my head.
The one that said ‘no entry’, more fuel fed.
I just looked at Angie's "Spoonful of Sugar" Facebook page and it looks like she is getting lots of great new merchandise! (Isn't her photography great?)
I'm an atheist but a very peculiar one. Other than organised religion, you won't hear me raising my voice against believers just for the sake of it. Each to their own. I think that religion as a cultural phenomenon is an interesting subject matter.
we are both mommies to sweet boys that have genetic disorders.
It has been 21 years and six months since my last visit. Staying in a little tourist hotel in the 1e arrondissement about 50m from the Comedie Francaise with Le Louvre within sight.
One of the key terms in this chapter was flow – combination of program segments, commercial and other material that make up the entire experience of watching TV.
Please note that entry to this event is by confirmed RSVP only; no tickets are available at the door.
“Desertion,” Clifford D. Simak, 1944 – Two volunteers who have had their bodies turned into “Lopers” so that they can survey the surface of Jupiter disappear. The administrator can’t in good conscience send another volunteer to look for them, so he transforms himself and his faithful dog into Lopers. Once in his new body, he decides not to return to humanity.
Glee
“But the sins of THISDAY are more,” he said.
Flying Dog Oktoberfish
#3 - Admit It, You Knew This Was Coming
Mom: "Well, could you wear each one at least one entire day? It sure creates a lot of laundry..."
Dogs are flying in the air by their valectro-wings
I’ll get through this. I’m too strong not to, but I have too much left to accomplish today to waste it in an emotional mess. That, and now I’m missing the movie that I have waited two weeks to watch with the family because we had to first wait for me to finish my essays and then we had to wait for N to get back from her trip to Oban with her boyfriend.
We went there and lodged a complaint with the kind police officer Mr. Chikke Gowda and left. As per Mr. Chikke Gowda’s advice we returned to the police station after about 1 hour and spoke to another officer Mr. Basha, took an acknowledgement and returned home. However, this acknowledgement will be useful to ONLY claim our insurance and NOT from the other party’s insurance. (The first complaint / acknowledgement given by Mr. Chikke Gowda was torn up).
I will miss our local market and I will relish the memory (and tastes!) of all the various markets we have either stumbled across in our travels or made a point of visiting.
Finally made it to the Easter Hols after a truly manic term. So much to catch up on, but hopefully I'll get round to blogging about recent events in the next few days.
Catelynn: "I love you."
But yes. I really do weep for humanity. In particular, the youth of today.
All of this is not indestructible.
And here were are, one year later.
Today I am here, tomorrow brings
Are we grateful for the body God has given us, which His Spirit now occupies? How do we show it in what we take through our eyes, our ears, and our mouth? By the radio station I listen to, am I showing gratitude to God or not? By the books I read, am I showing gratitude to God or not? By the quality of food that I eat, am I showing gratitude or not?
Kong Jin : Personally I love various kind of 80's and 90's Japanese, Korean and British music (also I focus on specific genres). But I'm influenced by another things since I joined this band (it means I met another different kind of music since I joined this band). I think I'm still constructing my thing between the things I like, I want to do and I can do.
Well good, it shows that children are observant about everyday life and are familiar with a normal part of that life, ie, drinking alcoholic drinks. Oh but the fake charity Alcohol Concern Cymru who are funded by the taxpayer (£250.000 in 2009/10) don't see it that way, reading between the lines it is clear they want a ban on the advertising of alcoholic drinks "Won't someone think of the children" is their cry and the idiots in the Welsh Government who fund these prohibitionists are likely to give in to their demands.
from the sea were always stirring, rich
A big win for Brian Foster who makes it 4 straight. After the fight, when given the opportunity to speak on the microphone, Foster thanked LaVerne Clark for taking the fight – stating, “Not a lot of people would be willing to fight me right now. And, I respect that.” Additionally, he announced, “I just want my spot back. And, I’ll fight anybody to get it,” clearly referring to his spot in the UFC where he was coming off of 2 straight wins before being medically released.
Coastweek– Reducing the increasing risk of cardiovascular diseases caused by disorders of the heart and blood vessels such as heart attacks, strokes and high blood pressure must begin in primary schools.
British governments are secular. Not because they have to be by law, but because it is simply the best way to ensure that religion and non-religion don’t get into a pissing contest.
The London Evening Standard’s front page lead about the poor levels of literacy and numeracy among many of the employees at the new Westfield Shopping Centre in Stratford City last September, confirms this point.
I’m back with old-school condo hype! Forget the civic politics, liquidation economics or journalistic hyperbolics. (Still deciding what that means.) Forget it all because it’s time for Calera at Clayton Village.
bring, take. Use bring to mean movement toward the speaker or writer; take means movement away from the speaker or writer (in fact, any movement that is not toward the speaker or writer). So the Canadian prime minister cannot be bringing a group of industrialists to a conference in Detroit, except in an article written from Detroit.I grew up following this rule -- or, rather, not knowing there was any other way to use bring and take; you bring something with you when you come, and take it when you go. And when I asked Boston Globe readers about their usage, in a 1998 column ($ except for subscribers), 73 percent said they did it my way.
At dawn, the sun shines like a million moons
♥ NYX Ridge Filler Base Coat.
Speaking of,
If today had a theme, it would be “The Great Debate.”
Phone: (redacted)
If you stopped reading here, it would sound like a very simple choice, to go with heaven, but I don’t think it is quite that simple.
If you’re gonna blog, you have to follow a couple of rules:
My knees were killing me, and from moving from a chair to a picnic bench, I went right on my ass! I had only had one drink, in case you're wondering!
It’s God’s love for you
3) Why the benevolent ETs take care of certain things but are obliged by “non-interference” rules.
Notes/Alterations: I loved sewing this, I really did. It took very little time to complete. I used my sloper to fit it initially but it was still really large in some areas, mainly the upper back. You can see below that I didn't do the lace-up back, it is loose enough to slip on over my head which I thought was more realistic than bothering with a zipper, which was my initial plan. I also had to cut the center back pieces in half across my waist, because I didn't have enough fabric otherwise. I didn't have enough for facings either, so I serged and then turned everything under once, since the trim on the neckline and sleeves over it is very stiff.
I can almost hear the shrieks of mortal despair...
My own view is that Hitchens was on the whole a hugely admirable person who is to be extolled for the strength of his character, for his courage in facing death, for his absolute willingness to defend and live out his beliefs, for his eloquence in all venues—but above all for his writing and talks.
Then, in his true silly and cantankerous manner, the waiter wanted to prove that our initial breaded clam order was foolish – as if the calamari steaks didn’t speak for themselves. He dropped off a plate with two measly clams for us to sample. We appropriately frowned on their appearance alone:
Also happening this week was a product review! I tried the Quaker Oatmeal Real Medleys. I tried the apple, cranberry, and walnut version of this instant oatmeal. The packaging is durable and I can easily see myself popping this into my work tote if I am running late one morning. After adding hot (they called for boiling but I only had my keurig to help me out) water and stirring, I let it sit for 3 minutes. After it was ready I took note of the sweet aroma of apples and cranberries. The oatmeal itself was pretty good however, if you only like smooth, non textured oatmeal or porridge, this is not for you. You actually have to chew parts of it, including the halved walnuts. All in all I would give this item a 7 out of 10 and would probably buy it again if it went on sale.
* exclude: sys/shmsys
Interestingly, while checking my spelling of ascendent, I find that back in 1997 Ecology itself was looking for a new “more robust central paradigm” to counter the “prevailing mechanistic paradigms of ecology” and was looking at, among other things, complexity theory – in a book called Ecology, the Ascendent Perspective Robert E. Ulanowicz.
Barbara has no idea just how astute her artistic eye is. Blizzard is no mere beggar, but rather some Great Pretender. He may not have his lower limbs, but he seems to have limitless wealth, limitless reach, and limitless power. He is a kingpin of crime, a man to be feared and revered, with his ear to the ground and a hand in every crooked enterprise imaginable.
Walt Whitman, a kosmos, of Manhattan the son,
This Winter Dark Ale is a concept reserved for the haul, the long push, the times when the day extends into the night. Roast punch and hop slice make this black ale your solution to winter sessions.
Take a look at the other "Blue" Challenge paintings listed below. I am sure you will find them delightful. I love them all!
Which is better – Push or Pull
Nor is there one cause, one cure, one treatment, one therapy. There is no one color, one religion, one culture, one belief…
Inside the house they found several bones lying around the living room, thigh bones and skulls on the kitchen table and bags of skulls waiting for attention. There were also books on sexual deviation and black magic, as well as other aspects of the occult.
Regrettably, there is nothing I can do. She is an adult with a valid driver’s license. As sad as this may sound, I have begun to wonder if I should explore life insurance policies. That is how much the idea of my mother driving scares me!
Maybe next time? I would sure love to see some more sparkly and shimmery nailpolishes from Catrice.
I am a little sad, but also very very grateful. He's healthy and this isn't turning into an emergency situation. Our doctor is able to plan ahead for a smooth delivery. I shed some tears yesterday for a bit because we had his D-day imagined going a certain way, and now it turns out everything will be different. But, I'm over that now and just super excited that I know when he'll be here! We do go for another appointment and sonogram next Tuesday. If something is wrong, my OB will do the c-section next Wednesday. Otherwise, Nolan Harper will be in my arms 11/16/10!!!
One nice thing about tour clothes is that I know what I’m going to wear: more or less the same thing I wore yesterday. I have 5 or 6 identical white t-shirts with me, about as many pairs of dress socks and skivvies. Brown grandpa slacks. Red sneakers. And I’ve got a new blue button-down shirt, which has already been designated for daily-wear martyrdom. Then there are my show clothes, which are even easier to put together: black on black on black. Done.
Try going to your local gym and talk to a trainer there.Well, the American Council on Exercise has released a chart stating what percentages for fat are acceptable and desired.A common question that many people have is, how many calories are in a diet plan to lose body fat?The real results happen after – minutes and even then they aren’t optimal.The approaches that you can do this will be to obtain a set of calipers from the nearby drugstore which will pinch a variety of regions of the body in order to determine body fat percentage.
AK: I describe my 1973-1974 junior year abroad in Bordeaux in French Lessons. Dreaming in French was a fun book to write because it allowed me to imagine what it would have been like to go to Paris instead. Now, Paris is where I spend my summers — so many summers that every street has a memory, even layers of memories. I’ll never forget the day I was walking down the Boulevard Saint-Germain and saw Susan Sontag in the Café de Flore, writing in her notebook. I hope there will always be hundreds of cafés in Paris where writers will go to make sense of the world.
And side by side on the ebbing tide
JVC NXPN7 Portable Audio System (With Dual IPod Docks) Review
Most of all always remember that you are a beautiful, strong, and amazing girl.here will be times that you fall apart but you will always be able to put yourself back together again
Continue? , home of possibly the greatest intro sequence ever, takes a different spin on the review, that being the “3 guys on a sofa” format. Ok, so it’s not that different, but what makes this show burn with comedic fury is the guys themselves; their chemistry is fantastic, being able to fire puns off thick & fast, all the while playing your favourite games, giving (sometimes scathing) reviews, and making you laugh like it’s Conker’s Bad Fur Day all over again.
2. Place the ribs in the slow cooker, add the bay leaves and pour the sauce over the top.
An advanced slant on this is for not even the parents to know. The person who has scanned the baby lets the cake shop know what sex it's going to be, and the cake is then made, and the parents don't find out until the cake is cut.
I let the image stand out so I decided to keep the card clean and simple.
No one loved diamonds more than Elizabeth Taylor, famously quoting that "big girls need big diamonds." And no celebrity is more identified with diamonds and jewels than the legendary actress. While she may have had numerous husbands (seven), her love affair with jewelry may be the one that lasted the longest. From the 33.19 karat Krupp diamond bestowed to her by two time husband Richard Burton to a ruby and diamond Cartier necklace from Mike Todd, she amassed an incredible collection over her extraordinary lifetime and even developed a perfume called White Diamonds.
and the work of the Holy Spirit,
Some in UMNO are optimistic of a peaceful transition. They say that if UMNO-BN loses, then Najib would be forced to resign immediately. UMNO would need a scapegoat and Najib and his wife Rosmah Mansor would have to take the fall. If they refuse, then UMNO will use its “internal mechanism” to bring the duo down. The power brokers know that if the loss was due to Najib’s weak leadership, all they need to do is to sacrifice Najib, which is what they would happily do – and not their business empire.
A little later with passports stamped and stomachs grumbling we manage to hitch a lift to the first settlement: Corozal - a sunny beachside border town made up mostly of bus companies, money changers and tour operators. The friendly man who picks us up points out the remains of a Mayan fort on the hill behind town - forlorn and lost to ruin like so many others, yet somehow managing
Marriage is a comittment that two people who love each other make. YOU can't define that for the rest of the United States! Everyone deserves equal rights. Not just the select few who happen to fall into the realm of "normal."
Bra size:
4. Begin forming the kibbeh balls, use your thumb to work the shell mixture into a smooth hollow round in the palm of your hand. Place a small amount of fat in the middle of the kibbeh (about 1/2 tablespoon), then seal the kibbeh very well so there are no holes. Dampen you hands as you work to keep the meat from sticking. Once the kibbeh are formed, it helps to chill them for one hour before baking if you have the time.
like me, and you're going to see the Midnight showing,
I used to be so disillusioned with men, having done the majority of work in my marriage, watching friends do the same! Yet every so often I stumbled across a women excited that her husband bought and picked out her clothes. As a very independent woman I was horrified and could never imagine that! Well my son in law would have no trouble finding a perfect outfit for his wife, knowing her exact style and size. He's interested in her, what she does, how she feels, who she is! As is she in him! They love making each other happy!
11-16 Calgary, Alberta - Scotiabank Saddledome
And of watching them wonder.
Health is a group effort that directly impacts the happiness and productivity of a community. It’s a daunting challenge to tackle. But I’m going to start by picking up some extra food at the supermarket today for my church’s food pantry.
"Why do you love me?"
Theme not mandatory..just have fun and make some creations!
Cover design requires you to think beyond “painting a picture with words,” but also capture the essence of the novel in a picture. In today’s electronic book market, some design qualities remain, while others are unique to the new medium.
And I'm sorry, but if you pop that into the narrative anywhere, it will jolt you right out of it. It's a huge sign of amateurish writing. In my experiences, there are places where participle phrases are needed and totally work. But they should be used conservatively. And the sign of a talented writer is knowing when and when not to use them. A good editor should have caught these issues and fixed them.
I know I'm not a hopeless case
Ronson created the string arrangements for Lou Reed’s hit ‘Walk On The Wild Side’ and for Lou’s beautiful ballad, ‘Perfect Day’, both from the Transformer album, which he and Bowie produced.
I mean, I don't feel better havin' done all this. Not physically anyway, and I admit that clouds my judgement somewhat.
This program is also nice because it does not take into account your celeb body look-alike, just faces. If they did, I seriously doubt these ladies who are known for their rocking bodies would come up in my top 5. Not that I think Rosie O'Donnell or Mo'nique would come up, either, but, again, Jessial Biel? Kate Beckinsale? I wish. Doesn't everybody?!
So according to these Jews, the 25 per cent stake they still haven't paid for is not enough; they are now suing the company that effectively underwrote their purchase of the shares and which was enabling them to pay for them in installments (by a completely madcap dividend policy which was preventing Repsol from doing as much capital spending as they would have liked, but the Sapanish firm still managed to spend several billions more per year for exploration and production than under the previous corrupt and inefficient regime and increased output by several hundred per cent) for continued payments even though of course Repsol's economic interest in the company has just been terminated by an act of legislative fiat which of course would be recognised as *force majeure* in any but a Jew-run court in a banana republic without bananas like Argentina.
The problem is not so much that these are cliches, it’s that most firms stop right there at the “saying” part. They’re all “tell” and no “show.” Their claims ring hollow because they offer no evidence to support them.
Basic Grey Display Sampler Canvas - Size is 16" x 20"
I was honored to be a part of helping them share a little of themselves and what this lady meant to them. Thanks, "W's", for asking me.
We had lots of entries to win the Gingham ribbon and the winner, picked at random is
Ashton Kutcher on the other hand has been cursed it seems by Sheen. Two and a half Men‘s ratings are down with him on the show and he has been involved in a cheating scandal with his wife, Demi Moore.
We started our day out with a tour of the facilities and some more information about the ministry. After our tour we cleaned the preschool room from top to bottom. During cleaning we took a break for lunch. We were able to take our lunch and go down to the Day Center and eat with the women who had come in to have lunch. At first I was very apprehensive about where to just go sit and struck up a conversation with someone. I am not good at just starting up a conversation with people I know let alone people I don't know. I stood and analyzed the room for several minutes. Then this boisterous lady came in with two little girls. She sat the girls down and then went to get food. That was it, I went and sat down. I have no problem talking to kids. So I sat and talked to them while their grandma got food. The oldest was 7 and in first grade, perfect I can relate Ellie is in first grade. We talked about first grade and her likes and dislikes. The youngest was 4, she didn't talk much. The grandma came to sit down, she was a little grouchy. One of the little girls started talking about her dad and the grandma interrupted her and said "don't go there, we are not going to talk about your mommy and daddy." The grandma finally started talking to me and was talking about classes she was taking and how she had to write a paper on the movie The Help. I made the mistake of telling her I had seen it. She immediately wanted to to write down the cliff notes for the movie. Luckily she had to go take a smoke break and had to leave the building.
THE THING WITH TWO HEADS
Sadly, this was to be the film's only exposure in the UK, although it did play at film festivals in Europe. For Despins, the act of finishing the film, and getting such a deeply idiosyncratic labour lof love onto an actual cinema screen, was a surreal and exciting experience: “I remember driving down to the Electric Cinema with Bill, and we sat outside in the car and said to each other, 'Can you imagine there are people inside there sitting in there watching Duffer?' And we thought it was a bit of a hoot! They're actually sitting there, and not only that, they paid to get in! That was quite a moment!”
And now look at us. A year later and a completely different team from the one that limped out of Memphis and back home to Athens. As I think back on that night a year ago and I remember that hard rain that fell after the game, I’ve come to realize that it was a cleansing rain. And I’m glad Memphis and the Liberty Bowl happened. Because it precipitated a change within the program that we all love. A change that we can now be proud of.
"I will never be the woman with the perfect hair, who can wear white and not spill on it.” - Carry Bradshaw The Pretty One is the youngest daughter of a former 70s pageant queen and her first husband, a wealthy financier. A former debutante and southern belle, this Steel Magnolia is anything but. A visionary, she is the owner and creative mind behind a successful boutique communications and event firm.
I have to disagree. Vehemently. Sure, a spelling mistake or two might slip by. Nobody is perfect. Still, I like to think one would want to put some care into what goes out there for the world to see. Maybe I'm in the minority. I know there are many people who share this girl's view. It saddens me at how often I read statements like this:
Cod Liver Oil – See Marine Oil.
Pradip’s inspired idea was to create the Dip-Bahan, a faster, lighter rickshaw and then, under a microfinance model, allow pullers to buy the rickshaw and repay the loan in 18 months, on a daily basis. When banks refused to finance production of the new Dip-Bahans, Pradip went to businesses and cleverly got them to invest by giving them deeply discounted ad rates on the backs of the rickshaws. Once the puller owns his rickshaw, he can double his income and begin to pull himself and his family out of poverty. Pradip also finances uniforms, shoes, licenses, health and accident insurance, and photo ID cards under the same microfinance model, to bring respect, safety and camraderie to the profession.
Elf ... USA ... 9:30 PM
Even though Kevin deals with complex subject matter he believes that it is important to be able to convey multiple, rich images simply and without being overly complicated. He acknowledges that his writing is influenced by the tight, crisp style of American fiction.
The other creatures are not quite as impressive. The Sharkguards are just, well, stupid. I mean, a shark, walking on two legs, on land, beating up enemies with a bat. No, does not work for me. I would much rather fight with something that was half man, half horse or half woman, half bird… Much more realistic.
well, i rolled my bad ankle quite badly thursday afternoon during a routine walk home from work. one of the drawbacks of having a permanent ligament injury is the extremely painful affect any time you sprain the ankle again. luckily, 48 hours later, it seems back to where it was.. although, i have not run on it since. it got swollen and i had to ice it that night, and it was very tough to walk friday morning.
1 evidenced
Obama: There's no one with who?
Here's a little card for a special couple who are celebrating their 70th Wedding Anniversary today, now that deserves a serious WOW!
+ Stackable and stores easily in closets and under most beds.
Let those (believers) who sell the life of this world for the Hereafter, fight in the Cause of Allah; and whoso fights in the Cause of Allah and is killed orgets victory, We shall bestow on him a great reward. (V.4:74).
The onion sets have been planted.
Separate the dough into two portions. Roll each section out to an 11X14-inch rectangle. Brush the top with melted butter. Using a pizza cutter or sharp knife, cut the dough into two pieces, the long way. Then slice the dough into five or six strips across so you end up with 10 to 12 small rectangles. Roll each small rectangle up like a snail and place on a lightly greased baking sheet with the roll resting on it’s open edge. Repeat with the second portion of dough.
And so, twenty…er.. something years after we first met and house shared at university, George Dean and I have set up our dance theatre company AnaMorphic. When George came and helped to direct my solo Dead Man Dancing earlier in the year it was so evident that we should continue working with each other. given that we are both at crossroads in our lives (career wise) it was also clear that this should become a major, energy consuming project. So far we have spent an awful lot of our energy on our company name. I hope that you like it.
Salad Nicoise is a favourite of ours.
There were multiple funny conversations. Among them was this:
I have never been so excited for Easter than I am this year. We are having both our birth moms over for Easter lunch and for an egg hunt with their kids. What a privilege it will be to show these women the love of Christ.
The discussion continues below.
Ideally I want the Democrats to do that too, but so far the mythical "Blue Dogs" appear to be extinct or retired (where are the Zell Millers?).
Chandra Levy, murdered by an illegal alien from El Salvador in 2001, was Jewish. Adrienne Levine, aka Adrienne Shelly, the actress who was murdered by an illegal alien from Ecuador in 2006, was Jewish. David Rosenbaum, a veteran journalist who was beaten with a metal pipe by black robbers in 2006 and died from his injuries due to the incompetence of Washington’s minority-stuffed public services, was Jewish. Alan Senitt, who had his throat slashed and his companion sexually assaulted by black recidivist criminals in 2006, was Jewish. Jewish liberal activist too.
The President talks about his personal affairs everywhere. When he visited Singapore, I could remember a story in entertainment section that the President exchanged SMS with a beautiful reporter based in Singapore. Why media pick up this kind of stories is very obvious! And the reason I pick this up is my disappointment.
I am back. I am better than back. Because as Marty skillfully worked with me, I began to regain OT abilities I had gained during OT VII and VIII, that I actually didn’t know I had.
HW – Vladimir Starcencov (1-0) def. Craig Hudson (0-1) via TKO (ground and pound) at 0:59 of Round 1.
Best Overseas Brewery
My cousin got married last fall. Like many weddings, it was an occasion for family and friends to reminisce, reconnect, and bond. The wedding reception found me tucked away in a corner with a few cousins, most notably, the beautiful, often elusive, V. She inquired about my dissertation defense, mere days away, and my future plans. At that point I only knew I had to move. The sooner the better.
*Daddy/Jeff is thankful for Melanie (me!)
Answer: The biggest surprise was the amount of difficulty it was changing our routine from having to wake up and go to our corporate jobs to waking up and being our own bosses. It took us longer than we had originally anticipated to get comfortable with our new way of life that didn’t include any particular routine.
All of a sudden, Mitrali asked me “Hey, are you from Guwahati?” I was taken aback (since that was an unexpected question from a stranger) and replied, “Yes, why?” Then she told me that my face looked familiar to her senior in school.
iBooks Author should be a big hit with both small and large publishers, teachers, and anyone else who wants to become a published eBook author. While the original aim is the educational market, made obvious by all six templates being textbooks, iBooks Author really has much wider appeal and could very well start an independent iPad book publishing craze on the iBookstore just like the App Store did years ago for apps. I’ve been playing around with the app all morning and it really is nice, with surprisingly powerful tools put into a simple to use interface.
“Dan O’Ryan was once the wealthiest man in the San Fernando Valley and Ophelia, his wife and Norbert’s mother, was the most beautiful,” old Charlie Cohan told me as we rode our bikes. Sam, pedaling at one mile an hour, on the other side of me, agreed and said, with admiration, “Ophelia had an affair with Howard Hughes.”
When I was a kid, Thanksgiving night was usually spent on the road driving upstate to our house in the Catskills.
Gado Gado is one of the foods that come from Indonesia in the form of vegetables are boiled and blended into one, with a seasoning or sauce of crushed peanuts with egg slices on top and sprinkled with fried onions and a little fried chips crackers are also some that use shrimp crackers.
I see students with all sorts of special needs and issues.
I will post pictures at the end of what the Hurva shul looked like before and after 1948, and how it looks today.
Therefore, in order to inflict less of a burden on the cast, this year we decided not to book any performances until Valhalla Faire in South Lake Tahoe in early June, and have only a few "brush-up" rehearsals between then and Folsom at the end of the season. We have "front-loaded" the majority of our meetings, holding them in the months prior to our performances so that we will be a well-prepared ensemble. However, we are enforcing our rehearsal minimum, and have instituted a "gate list fee" for people who have not met their minimum requirements.
Don’t get me wrong, I like Zaela and all. She’s a good warrior. But you know, there’s a difference between being a good warrior and being a good person to have in charge of things, you know? And like, with Zaela, sheesh. Not the brightest bulb. If there’s a big fight coming, sure thing, I want her fighting on my side. But if there’s something going on that requires you to have your wits about you, or able to wrap your brain around something bigger than “me see, me smash”? Yeah, not so much.
If you paid attention, most people didn’t change, they continued cheating, lying, deceiving the people around them while claiming to be “mature.” In a recent conversation with a close friend, we exchanged stories about past relationship and people we’ve dated. This girlfriend had dated a man, or a boy to be more accurate, that had ended their relationship through a text message. I shook my head, but not in disbelieve. This boy had decided to put an end to a long relationship via text message and email. When my friend confronted this boy, the ex simply couldn’t do it face to face. He was to immature to say things weren’t working out, or to explain they’ve grown apart. Besides being immature, I told my friend that this person was really a coward, why? because as adults, either man or woman, the right thing would be to confront such a problem face to face, not via text or email. Don’t get it wrong, the word coward or immature has no gender, they come in all shapes and sizes. Beautiful, ugly, handsome or gorgeous, appearances can be deceiving.
We also lead the world!! This is extremely troubling and sad, and must be changed for New Orleans’ sake. What a statistic to lead the world in!
She has a tattoo of a wolf on her shoulder. She loves dogs and horses. She really loves dogs. She loves dogs so much that I can’t spend too much time in her house because I am allergic to dogs. I believe she uses them to protect herself against me like a Sloman’s Shield. The smell of the dogs combined with smoke is my idea of hell.
The price of petroleum surpasses $100 per barrel for the first time. Fidel Castro resigns as President of Cuba. Former building society Northern Rock is the first bank in Europe taken into state control, due to the subprime mortgage financial crisis in the United States. Bill Gates steps down as Chief Executive of Microsoft. Olympics take place in Beijing, China. Lehman Brothers files for bankruptcy so beginning the Global financial crisis. Barack Obama elected the 44th President of the United States becoming the first African-American President. Edmund Hillary, Bobby Fischer & Alexandr Solzhenitsyn die.
What is the technology?
We were headed for an organic farm tour and decided to pull out the old baby carrier. We were not sure if Max would still fit and like the baby carrier. He did let us ride him in the carrier for quite a while until he wanted to get down to play with the dogs at the farm :) It is so funny to look at this picture and see how big he has gotten; our baby is almost as long as his father's upper body ... WOW!
When the sun is on the way down and the day cooling off at 5;30, a bunch of 20 dusty kids arrive at an open air school. Rows of traditional classroom seats face the whiteboards. Mr. Suang walks across the road.
The one who calls the living room "little Havana" and is OK with that. The one who smiles through my fabulous idea of a photo shoot in a wedding dress and tux- at the beach- to celebrate our 15 year anniversary. Baby, I love you.....
Normally I think allergy shots are a waste of time... but for something like bee stings (where the reactions tend to be more severe), I would consider it. Do you know what the success rate is?
Dilly-dally with her heart like it’s my toy
Hell to Pay, again published in hardback in the UK by Orion, this time in 2002. Not untypically for Orion, the design of the dustjacket is uncredited – Right as Rain's jacket design is similarly uncredited – but the front cover photo is by Ed Holub – and if you're wondering at this point why I didn't tell you who took the photo on the front of Right as Rain, that's because there's no credit for that, either. Hell to Pay is, as I say, the second of Pelecanos's three novels starring Derek Strange and Terry Quinn (Strange of course features in a further two – the aforementioned What It Was, and 2004's Hard Revolution); there's a synopsis and extract on the author's website, and an entertaining and personal review by Karen G. Anderson on the January Magazine site. And to complete the set:
mother’s quiet call seeped into her consciousness. Despite the miles between them, her mother’s probing mind reached hers, long-tentacled thoughts grasping and prodding for a hold. Melusine blocked her mother out and sighed.
His successor, the sleepy head Abdullah Ahmad Badawi also did the same for 2004 to 2007. He and his fourth floor boys went berserk in 2008, ballooning the deficit to RM35 billion. And you think that is the peak?
So let's catch up. Kerri brought home her first report card. Considering all she has been going through and dealing with, I was not expecting such an awesome report card. We are so very proud of her for doing her best, and achieving such high scores! She finally made her first "A-" in Visual Arts. All her other grades vary between "B" and "B+". And she was graded "Excellent" in the areas of Responsibility, Independent Work, Initiative, and Collaboration. Yes, I am bragging - because my daughter has an IEP at school that is working! And now that the teachers know and use different methods to ensure her comprehension, and understand her issues, Kerri is blossoming in school - her grades reflect that accomplishment. I could not be prouder of my daughter; and so extremely grateful to her school and dedicated teachers.
It’s UMNO that fears losing power
Draw or Create a Collage:
So when do we suddenly stop looking for new challenges and bigger tastes and beers with different labels with foreign writing on them and stop worrying about how bad a beer might taste and instead wonder how good a beer might taste? What makes us sit there and think; “Don’t imagine I’ll ever find a nicer beer than that so I really can’t be arsed looking”?
I'm at war with obscurity. Free, properly applied, is the greatest weapon in my arsenal.
"It's where you belong."
So I ask myself: Why do I love different? Why do I feel most at ease in the company of people who live as aliens in a foreign land? (no, not illegal aliens... just alien as in "not native" - as I would be if I moved to China, for instance).
“I’m her boss,” he said with such a tone of authority that it made Raymond think twice about what he’d just thought.
I’ll stop whining now, just tell me you missed me.
The push-button starter is a fun little quirk of the Prius that I have come to love. It makes turning on the car more akin to turning on a computer (a particularly apt analogy, considering the “gas gauge consumption game” one constantly plays with the accelerator) than starting a license-requiring powerful and potentially dangerous machine. With the keyless remote that my Prius came with, you don’t even have to put a key in the ignition. Just open the door, turn on the computer, er.. starter, and away you go…at a silent electric-only glide for the first 20 km/hr.
This man had been there through laziness, fitness, pathetic-ness, success, despair and just day to day, boring life.
Unfortunately, there were issues. The reed is really rusty, and the one I used to replace it wasn't as wide, affecting the shed. So I have to clean the old one, or get a new one.
We witness some of Naritsugu’s depraved acts and abuse of power, the evidence culminating in a grotesque spectacle that sees Miike at his extreme and leaves the audience in no doubt that Naritsugu is pure evil of an aristocratic sort.
(E) None of the above
I looked at a few local child care centers and got pricing on enrolling both Miss Paige and the Big D in a full-time, 5 day per week program. The cost? $2,000 per month. And that wasn’t even at the most expensive child care centers!.$2,000 would be the cost of a middle-of-the-road, not fancy schmancy, child care center. $2,000 would be MORE than a single paycheck. My monthly take-home pay would plummet from a nice $3,400 to $1,400 after paying for childcare. Subtract all the other expenses involved in working outside the home - gas, clothes, lunches, etc. – and we’re probably talking about $1,200 max per month take home pay. For full-time work. 50-60 hours per week of work. $300 per week. Equals about $5.00 per hour. Below minimum wage?! Oh my.
We hear the calling of those gone by to follow the path to us.
I got a call from a mate in Beechworth to say that Ben had finished bottling his latest creation for the Beechworth Harvest Festival which was aptly named ‘The Harvest’ (he also has a special seasonal brew for the Celtic Festival called Celtic Red Ale) The Harvest is a pale ale with, as Ben so beautifully put it, ‘shitloads of hops thrown at it’ – but in a very nice way. And not just any hops. In fact, not any hops that anyone else can get at the moment!
So what do I do now? How do I get out of the funk? I mean, yeah... it would help if I had single girlfriends to go out with from time-to-time. At my age, most girls are married and/or have children already. I don't have either. (That is not my attempt at a pity party... LOL) I enjoy being single and not having certain responsibilities. So I guess I need to figure it all out. I need to figure out how to mesh the "home-life" with the "party-girl" or "good-time-girl" that's still inside me. Hmmm... any suggestions??
I’m flying without wings now, I always sing
And let's also be honest about our true selves and natures. If you live in Brooklyn these days, there is strong chance--some statisticians put it at 90%--that you came from a town called Elsewhere, USA. In other words, you are a transplant. Or to put it less kindly, you are a gentrifying interloper who followed your vital stores of self-delusion and self-aggrandizement and your strong gut feeling that, like, Tony Manero, you were destined for better things, to the Big City. You found Manhattan a touch twee and vulgar (and too expensive) for your artistic tastes, and hence, you went to Brooklyn and joined one of its various colonies of hipness.
And, winter with kids also sucks dinosaur balls. You just never know which one the day will bring. I've already received the no-school-tomorrow call tonight. I've beeen curled up in the fetal position, chewing on my hair ever since.
But there’s another thing that should make veteran hacks more, not less valuable as time goes on. Many ‘old school’ guys also know the meaning of “fit to print”, namely that there’s tittle-tattle and then there’s stuff actually worth writing about.
This morning I organized little run down to the Promenade to see the Enterprise get a ride into JFK on the back of a 747. It was really cool but I thought it had been in space. I learned hours later that it was a prototype. According to Wikipedia It "performed test flights in the atmosphere. It was constructed without engines or a functional heat shield, and was therefore not capable of spaceflight. On September 17, 1976, the first full scale prototype was completed." WTF, it's a model.
There are more reasons, but suffice it to say that God wants us to be part of a local church. But just because you are part of a local church does not mean that you are experiencing the deep benefits of living life with other Christians. You can be a lone ranger Christian sitting in a packed pew every Sunday morning. And let’s face it, we all have this tendency to one degree or another. What do I mean? I mean that we have to do more than just show up at church events. We have to open ourselves up to people and allow them to speak into our lives with God’s truth and wisdom.
As I mentioned in my last post, Hadot spends much of the first book describing in great detail the ways in which philosophy was lived, taught, practiced, and written in the cultural and historical contexts in which it was produced in the Ancient world. And he argues that Ancient Greco-Roman philosophy, while clearly divided into schools, they shared certain fundamental premises together as all being recognized as philosophy. Despite the variety of Ancient groupings, including the four classical Ancient schools, including the Platonic Academy, the Aristotelian-Peripateic Lyceum, the Stoics, and the Epicureans, as well as the off-shoot ‘anti-schools’ of Skepticism and Cynicism, or the first schools of the Pythagoreans, along with the later development of Neo-Pythagorean and Neo-Platonic schools, there was, particularly by the end, much in common between these. All who practiced a “way of life” based on theories, rather than beliefs in a deity, were known in the Ancient world as philosophers, whether they wrote or taught that philosophy. Clearly this is different from the present, in which those who write and teach are called philosophers, while those who practice a life of disciplined reflection, not based on a deity, have no particular title at all.
My plan for the last two miles was stolen from Emily’s Cherry Blossom 10 mile race recap, where the last two miles were all about survival. I just had to keep running dammit. I tried doing some math in my head about potential times and paces but it was just a distraction from the fact that my legs felt like they were moving through thick thick tar mixed with a side of molasses and cement. And when I did hear my breathing through my headphones, I sounded like a hippo trying it drink and breathe at the same time.
The SOLSC has also given me back some of my "me" time. As a new mom, I am learning how to balance my various responsibilities, but still reserve a small amount of time each day for myself. Writing has become a gift. Commenting on other writers' posts has enabled me to meet new people, see commonalities and differences between myself and others. Reading a slice and then commenting on it, knowing that the writer is going to appreciate my comment, has taught me that everyone needs some type of encouragement and recognition, and by reading and commenting on other slices, it is a way to appreciate someone you have never met before. The SOLSC brings people of all different ages, men and women together in an attempt to keep the writing community closely knit. I believe that my writing progresses each and every day, which will likely benefit my students. So, thank you Ruth and Stacey and to the whole SOLSC community for a job well done and for helping me find the writer within me once again.
Last night, I am sitting in my office, watching a movie with someone and I started getting hit with an amplified version of what I have been experiencing for a couple of months now. It was unpleasant and powerful. I took certain steps to tone it down and that worked, for awhile. I went to bed and could not sleep. In a little while this ‘attack’; I don’t know what else to call it, ratcheted up significantly. My whole body felt waves of force moving over it, like highly amplified chicken-skin, rolling over me like ocean waves. I asked for help from my invisible guardians and found myself moving my hands in unknown gestures and speaking out in an unfamiliar tongue; certainly not any of the commonly used languages of the day. This served to intensify the experience and I was told this was supposed to happen. Shortly after, most of the phenomena went away but sleep was out of the question.
You know that book about people's different love languages? It's big in church circles, I think, and so I've had this conversation probably ten times over, and I usually would say mine was some combination of quality time or gifts or words of encouragement or something. But once I was talking with my best friend and I told her mine was effort, which wasn't a great way to put it, but what I meant by that, I think, was this: that I maybe first understood love by the way I've always known my father is never not thinking of me.
I would love to hear stories about secure leaders you’ve worked with or insecure leaders you’ve worked with and what it was like in either case.
If subscribers are being frugal, they can just read the free articles per month news outlets offer. Or find those that charge less than $5 per month such as Ongo or The Christian Science Monitor. For only $0.99, subscribers can access The Guardian.
A study last year published in the Journal of Medical Ethics surveyed papers formally retracted between 2000 and 2010 in the health sciences. About a quarter of them were retracted for scientific fraud, and half of these had a first author who had had another paper previously retracted for scientific fraud. Coauthors of these repeat offenders had, on average, three other papers each that had been retracted. Americans, it may be worth noting, far more often had papers retracted for fraud, and were repeat offenders, than their overseas colleagues.
In the anime, Ash’s Pidgeotto evolved into a Pidgeot, but it left him soon after in order to protect some wild Pidgeotto and Pidgeots. Ash promised to returned for it, but hasn’t kept his promise so far. In the games, the rival Blue has a Pidgeot as part of his team.
In thinking about it more recently, however, I was wondering about taking this kind of explanation – that the soul has an appetitive quality – and marrying that to some other metaphysical system. Say, for example, something like the Medieval Doctrine of Exemplarism, according to which God is psychologically the first known, and it is ‘in him’ that we see ideas and so forth. Some have wanted to place Nicholas Malebranche, the student of Rene Descartes, in this tradition of Exemplarism with Bonaventure. Whether that’s entirely accurate or not, I’m not sure, but in any case, he gives a succinct quote which I think is useful here to help convey the idea. He says:
In a separate bowl, sift together dry ingredients. Add wet ingredients, and whisk until blended and smooth. Stir in chocolate chips.
“By God’s grace, it will be okay. I think the devil want to hurt you. But by the grace of the Lord, all will be fine.”
in the midst of these posts, i was was swept into my new job. my new schedule.
iiNet Chief Executive Officer, Michael Malone, said the judgment supported the company’s position and proved the claims made against it were unfounded. "iiNet has never supported or encouraged unauthorised sharing or file downloading,” Mr Malone said. "Today’s High Court five-nil ruling confirms that iiNet is not liable for ‘authorising’ the conduct of its customers who engaged in online copyright infringement. "This marks the end of more than three years of legal argument and challenges."
If the UN wants to support the ending of oppressive regimes its money would be better spent translating and disseminating literature on effective nonviolent resistance to oppressed people around the world. The spread of weapons and violence will never bring peace, for they are antithetical.
There are three types of control structures
We were one jump away from winning. But all the way at the beginning of the jump track. And there were centurions on board.
Amongst all the Anarchy we have been witnessing this week
The restructuring could lead to additional one-time charges in the remaining quarters of 2012 in an estimated amount of up to Euro 70 million, it had said.
The opening pitches you right into the middle of the plot with no time wasted on backstory or build-up. Within a few minutes the viewer knows exactly what’s going on and what led up to it. A man has broken his leg out in the desert and his wife and her lover have decided to abandon him and let nature take its course. The unfortunate victim is one Don Carson (Robert Ryan), a hard drinking businessman with plenty of money but few friends. Carson has gone out to a remote part of the desert in the company of his faithless wife Gerry (Rhonda Fleming) and a mining engineer, Duncan (William Lundigan), to scout for manganese deposits. When an accident presents Gerry and Duncan with a heaven sent opportunity to rid themselves of Carson they grab it with both hands. All they need do is manipulate the evidence and cook up a story about Carson going off on an alcoholic bender to be home free. However, the scheming lovers underestimate their victim and his resourcefulness – Carson may have led a pampered life of privilege but he has a powerful will to live and an instinct for survival. The film twists and turns its way to the conclusion and, as it does so, the character of Carson moves smoothly from being initially an unsympathetic boor to a man the viewer can both admire and root for. The best scenes in the movie have Carson battling against the merciless desert, with nothing but his thoughts to keep him company. There’s also some clever cutting to point up the contrasting fortunes of the protagonists: while the hero grows desperate for water there’s a sudden jump to a shot of Duncan diving into a crystal clear pool; and when Carson finds himself on the verge of starvation the next scene has his wife delicately carving a roast back at the LA mansion.
Scene: Driving to school this morning. Radio inaudible.
While the split peas are cooking, make the pesto. Combine the cilantro, half the toasted pepitas, parmesan, garlic, lemon juice, serrano chile, olive oil, and water. Season with salt to taste. Puree using an immersion blender or regular blender or whatever form of blending machine you possess. Continue blending the pesto until comes together into a vibrant green sauce (not unlike this here kale juice).
I am having legal counsel advice me on the sale of the home, and as I specifically told you, I am working to keep you in the apartment with the sale of the home. There are no security issues to your apartment, the outer door is secure and working properly and no one has access to the inner portion to the apartment. I am the only one that has keys to the apartment.
First, many digital cameras have “floating ISO” values. I detest this feature and always set it to a reasonable ISO (100 or 200) and always use this unless I specifically decide not to. The floating value will render your ability to change f/stops and shutter speeds either a difficult or an impossible task. Every time the ISO value doubles, that is the equivalent of opening up one f/stop in light capturing value assuming you leave your f/stop and shutter speed the same. (See! Complicated!)
Winners Tammy Persing, Gavin Goodwin and William Hampton entered an essay contest explaining what it would mean to them to win a Polaris RANGER RZR, and how they and their family would enjoy the vehicle. Their essays touched on how the vehicles would give them the ability to enjoy life with their families, be more adventuresome, and give them freedom away from the hospitals and post-war challenges they have endured.
Since I always enjoy fresh local produce, Kvarner scampi (as one of the absolute best what Croatia can offer!) was high on the list- And especially when I saw their scampi menu: Škampijada na Kvarneru!
I released him within a few seconds, and had a good chuckle to myself. Surely, the gnat spinning fly and the gnats in the weeds are a coincidence. There is no hatch here. At this point, the tree swallows were starting to get really annoying. The chirping, the near collisions with my head, and their constant presence was just a bit much to take. I was trying to concentrate. Damn birds.
This new housing benefit idea is particularly bad because it goes against not just the letter, but the actual spirit, of welfare reform. It’s not about encouraging independence. All it does is transfer dependency to the family instead of the state.
Well.. this blog ended up being quite a bit more personal than I had intended, and quite a bit less about gaming than it should be. Let me add that I played Madden practically all weekend, getting franchise mode going. I won the Super Bowl (against the Texans 14-0) the first year, lost the NFC Championship against the Eagles in the second year, then accidentally spent too much in Free Agency, so I couldn’t sign my draft picks. I’m pretty sure that’s how I killed my last franchise, and I wound up not playing it again. Chris played the other team a couple of times, and both seasons, all the NFC East teams except the Redskins made the playoffs! I am so excited and optimistic about the Free Agent and Draft choices that Jerry and the ‘Boys made this offseason that I just CANNOT WAIT for the football season to start again. Also, I’ll be trying to get tickets to the Cowboys @ Seahawks game in week 2.
My hope is for all of you to celebrate Jesus today and always!
Case Study Conditioning: From a youth I was quite different from the family that surrounded me. My professional goals, social desires, and monetary habits were offensive to my family and in an effort to control my actions I was made to feel guilty for being the way I was.
Chocolate crepes made with Nutella in France or Italy and New York Pizza at any pizza joint in NYC.
The remarkable and unusual book I have been reading is called “The Warren Buffett CEO” by Robert P Miles and it is remarkable as a tribute to a great manager, because it is primarily not about Buffett. It is about the great CEOs he hires.
What about the debt we owe our ex-colonial peoples? Pakistan and Bangladesh, at least, were both part of British India.
1/20 vs. Phoenix, L 71-79 (L -6.5), Under
Post 54.
Combat Nuclear Terrorism
Lim cited his experience as a victim of Section 8A, when he was found guilty of publishing false news in 1994 and jailed for 18 months in Kajang prison.
I oblige.. (in a hillbilly kind of way)
You may already have a QR code scanner already on your phone - if you don't you can upload any of these apps - for your iPhone - Red Laser (free), NeoReader (free), Optiscan ($1.99) For your Android Phone - QR Droid.
The Etsy Registry is so easy to navigate. All you have to do is sign up and pick the items you love. How much fun! I wanted to share some of my favorite finds from each of the categories. I hope you can all get some inspiration from them or even purchase a few for yourself or a friend. Here we go!
Many famous people read this blog, although they will never admit it. I know Helen Zille, Thabo Mbeki, Pieter Mulder , Beeld editor Tim du Plessis and many more frequent this blog.
We honor you, Dear Ones. We admire your strength and courage to be these amazing spirits inside human form. Honor your humanness, Children. Feeling comfortable within your own skin paves the way for you to connect with the Spirit that you are. Create a daily routine of ritual that is for and about yourself. It can be as simple as looking in the mirror each morning and saying the words, “I Love You.”
You found me when I couldn’t find myself,
These days you can remove blemishes, crop, remove objects (referring to my barn photos below: the tree limbs on the left in sepia photo were cropped out of the colored photo).
Charity's nomadic childhood has left her itching to settle down, and she immediately falls in love with all the storybook town has to offer--everything, that is, except its sexiest and most famous resident, former world-class cyclist Josh Golden. With her long list of romantic disasters, she's not about to take a chance on another bad boy, even if everyone else thinks he's perfect just the way he is. But maybe that's just what he needs--someone who knows the value of his
In "Christmas Returns to Canaan," Cyrus reprises his role as Daniel Burton in the 1960s-era saga of a family's experiences in racially charged Canaan, TX. In the story, Daniel's son Bobber needs extensive orthopedic surgery and months of intensive physical therapy to recover from being struck down by an automobile. Rodney Freeman (Matt Ward, narrates the story), the young black man who Daniel took into his home and raised as another son, has become a famous writer and offers to fly Daniel and Bobber to San Francisco and to pay for the surgery. Once in San Francisco, Daniel meets Briony Adair (Gina Holden), a physical rehabilitation specialist who will be working toward Bobber's recovery. When therapy progresses slowly, Bobber invites Briony to come home to Canaan to spend Christmas with the Burtons and continue his treatment. Briony is a natural at caring for a thriving family, but Sarah, Daniel's daughter, distances herself not wanting to dishonor her late mother's memory with the caring woman who has captivated Daniel's time and attention. A dust-up involving a Burton family Christmas tradition causes Briony to leave, and Sarah immediately feels sad that she behaved so jealously.
now there is no hot water and hasn't been for two weeks - and they don't call this an emergency which is so frikkin weird!!
Do your characters ever take on a life of their own?
12. Dead Man's Party - Oingo Boingo
drifting puffs of wood smoke
Or overcome it
LiveScience.com chronicles the daily advances and innovations made in science and technology. We take on the misconceptions that often pop up around scientific discoveries and deliver short, provocative explanations with a certain wit and style. Check out our science videos, Trivia & Quizzes and Top 10s. Join our community to debate hot-button issues like stem cells, climate change and evolution. You can also sign up for free newsletters, register for RSS feeds and get cool gadgets at the LiveScience Store.
Jesus knew that such a declaration would bring upon Him the fierce denunciation of His enemies seated in the midst. Controversy was sure to result from such an assumption of divine prerogatives by Jesus.
XO Nikki
Now some tour/concert news. Below you will find my travel calendar thru Christmas. All dates subject to change, but I doubt that will happen. All these are free and open to the public unless otherwise noted.
Q — Citizens United was good for America because:
of loose morals and violence.
Events or lectures that tend to pull in the greatest audience and satisfy the most people are OFTEN those with the LEAST to gain wisdom from. Often, they encourage laziness of thought and simply stroke our ego.
It's definitely a better translation. That's probably the biggest misconception that critics of the recent revision of the General Roman Missal have. They perceive the new translation as some sort of conservative formalization of the text that is only ostensibly more faithful to the Latin. Unfortunately, that's not the case. Though there are some changes that really are no better, and certainly tend towards archaic jargon, the vast majority of the dramatic shifts -- especially to the Confiteor, the Gloria, and the Nicene Creed -- are certainly far more accurate.
(There is a ray of hope, though. If you send money and your book to a scam agent, or a scam publisher, you're probably never going to see your money again, but your BOOK is probably safe from plagiarism. Scam agents and publishers are interested in MONEY, not in selling books. If they could actually sell books, they might not have to charge those upfront fees. Selling a book is a lot of WORK.)
But then I had a small out of body experience. (The experience was small, not my body) I floated out of my body and could only watch as the fat bird with a fag in her hand replied.......
Rinse all the vegetables under cold water and pre-chop them.
#14 “The Future” Donovan Ruddick -The 6’9 Monster
Whose names begin with “K”
A Christmas Carol
Problems relating to the change of use of Albion House rumble on. At the last Planning Committee, permission was granted, against the wishes of local residents to create 13 HMO bedsits.
There are only two languages: love and fear.
Tonight when I got home from the store he was in another of the down moods. He'd had a bathroom accident and that seemed to start the spiral. I don't even consider it bad - just a little mishap - and he cleaned it up. He says he's too weak to be home alone. Amy and I tell him he's weak because he's not doing regular exercises to build up and maintain his strength. We talk about the future. He doesn't want to go to assisted living but he knows that he really can't stay home alone. It's enough to get depressed over, and I mean for anyone.
There isn’t much of a set-up for a plot here, just a set-up for goofs and low-grade school mysteries to solve. That’s okay. Medaka Box did the same thing and looks crap.
The flowers used on the card are from Wild Orchid Crafts. HobbyVision has now a big sorting of those lovely flowers! On all the flowers I put Stickels, Stardust as usual.
Manchester City have crumbled in recent months and have allowed their arch-rivals to take almost complete control of the title race.
*Stone Lukcy Basartd Ale
Heidi
It's turning out to be a gorgeous spring here in Virginia! The weekend was perfect for outdoor play, so while A napped, E and I went into the back yard to make garden homes for her rubber bugs. (I'm afraid all real bugs were quickly evicted.) Yes, Tinkerbell somehow got wind of the new condos and - Tink being Tink - made herself right at home.
“Later, that mother lent her phone to the daughter so she could talk to a boyfriend. The father thought this daughter was using TYSA to find boyfriends. So we tracked the phone number – and it wasn’t from Kisumu, where she had gone for a running competition. It was the neighbor boy. So we were not to blame. I remember her because she was a ver good 800 meters runner.”
